Mike D’Antoni reiterating that he’ll coach tonight: “This is fun, this is great, looking forward to it.” #GoLakers  
The videoboard prepping for Mike D'Antoni's debut STAPLES Center  
7:30pm PT 
should be a good one, glad you can make it! #GoLakers 
awesome! #GoLakers 
always an eclectic mix at STAPLES Center when the purple & gold hardwood is down. #GoLakers 
#farewellbeckham Get our city & the another championship before you go & we’ll see you courtside soon!  
see you soon. #GoLakers 
awesome! See you soon. #GoLakers 
winning is always the goal, hope we can give you a nice birthday present. #GoLakers 
Lakers take on the Nets in 23 hours. #GoLakers RT Court is down & ready for tomorrow  
purple piping 
Photo gallery from last night's win over the Rockets:  Check them out. #GoLakers 
"@dariusmorris4 Seizing The Moment -  #GoLakers 
Big congrats to our LA sports brethren, the Galaxy are headed back to the MLS Cup. RT #playlikeachamp  
Here you go:  RT I need that Howard block to fastbreak dunk combo on video. Thanks in advance. 
STATS: 28p 13r 3b. Kobe's 18th triple-double 22p 11r 11a 3s. 17p. 15p. #GoLakers 
The get their 4th win in 5 games with the 119-108 victory over the Rockets. The home stand ends Tuesday vs. Brooklyn. #GoLakers 
we'll try to stay hot for you Kaley! 
Kobe grabs the offensive rebound to notch his 18th career triple-double. 20pts, 10 rebs, 10 asts. Congrats Mamba! #GoLakers 
Dwight's buzzer beater doesn't fall, but grabs the offensive rebound & finds Howard cutting for the monster jam. 109-90. 
agree 
haha Rob gets after it! 
it's been a good run for Bernie! 
that was a good one 
What's been your favorite part of the games this weekend? RT This game is so fun. 
KOBE TRIPLE-DOUBLE WATCH: #24 is just 2 rebounds away. 18 points, 8 rebounds & 10 assits with 12 minutes to play. 
Lakers lead is 98-87 after 3 quarters against the Rockets. 
Congrats to on his 15,000 career point! Pau is just the 10th foreign born player to reach the mark.  
HIGHLIGHT: ends the 1st quarter with a full court pass to -  
KOBE TRIPLE-DOUBLE WATCH: 11 points, 7 rebounds, 9 assists at the half. #GoLakers 
Halftime: Lakers 68, Rockets 60. 4 Lakers in dbl-figures, Howard 18, Morris 12, Bryant 11, Gasol 10. New career high for Morris. #GoLakers 
League Pass is blacked out locally. You can find your channel by provider and area here:  
Triple-double watch already for Kobe 11pts 7rebs 5asts. The last Laker to have a triple-double was Pau (22/11/11) on 4/18/12. #GoLakers 
The touchdown play from Metta to Pau ups the Lakers to 74% (17/23) shooting on their way to 40-29 lead after the 1st. #GoLakers 
Not on NBA TV tonight. Tuesday night's game is though. 
Go here to find your channel by provider and area:  
Kobe's 3rd assist of the night is a little leave to that he throws down for his 8th point of the night. 16-15 LA. #GoLakers 
No. In LA you should be able to get on Ch., 691. If you can't, contact DirecTV customer service. 
Are you in southern CA or NV? Per NBA rules, broadcast is local only, out of market you'd need League Pass. 
STARTERS: Kobe Bryant, & vs. Lin, Harden, Parsons, Patterson & Asik. #GoLakers 
Negotiations are still on-going w/ Comcast. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
Negotiations are on-going w/ Dish. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
Lakers ready to take on the TV: & RADIO: & KWKW1330 
On & tonight. Go here to find the channel if you're local:  
There is an agreement for Verizon to carry the networks in southern CA, so if you're local, you should be able to watch. 
Full Photo Gallery from the statue ceremony:  Check it out. #GoLakers 
best kind of ridiculous out there 
Saturday Practice Report:  Talking last night's offensive outburst, defense for D'Antoni & managing minutes. 
DirecTV carries on Channel 691 
Mike is big on self deprecating humor, just a joke 
Mike is big on self deprecating humor, take a joke 
#GoLakers RT Since Oct 12th as shot 80% from the free throw line in practice.  
If you missed any of the statue unveiling ceremony, you can watch it right here:  #GoLakers 
New story by "Abdul-Jabbar Honored, Statue Unveiled" -  #GoLakers 
awesome! 
Photo gallery from last night's win over Phoenix:  #GoLakers 
Big game for 22pts (5 three pointers), 6rebs, 3asts & 3 stls.  #GoLakers 
FINAL: Lakers 114, Suns 102. LA cruises to a win with a season high pts. Kobe leads with 31 & 6. Rockets visit Sunday. #GoLakers 
Lakers open up their largest lead of the evening, up 15 at 101-86 w/ 9:21 left to play. #GoLakers 
A little between qtr treat for the twitter folks, a new Kareem Statue Wallpaper. DOWNLOAD:  | PIC:  
Lakers finish the 3rd on a 10-2 run to take a 92-84 lead heading into the 4th. Yes, 92pts through 3 quarters. Having fun? 
awesome! 
Metta drops in his 5th triple of the evening. Haven't done this since playoffs last season, but he deserves it: MW3!!!!! 
you're outside of the Lakers local broadcasting footprint. Need to order League Pass to get out of market games like before. 
Who's the coolest guy in this pic? (photo by  
Mike's not coaching tonight, getting rehab on his knee in the locker room. Targeting Sunday for his 1st game. 
The Lakers concede a 15-0 Suns run but answer back w/ a 12-0 run of their own & lead 62-57 at the half. Metta, Kobe & Pau in dbl figures. 
Negotiations are still on-going w/ Dish. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
welcome, what do you think so far? 
We recommend that you reach out to DirecTV customer service. 
Pau Gasol was the last of the Lakers starters to get a bucket, but he's 5/5 from the field & leads all scorers w/ 10pts. 30-26 LA. 
it's not fun, but Mike should be on the sidelines soon. 
NBA rules limit the broadcast of games to the Lakers territory. Out of market you'd need League Pass to watch the games. 
Negotiations are still on-going w/ Dish. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
Negotiations are still on-going w/ Dish. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
Cox agreed to carry the networks. Go here to find channel for your area:  
Try KFIG 1430AM – Fresno 
welcome 
Negotiations are still on-going w/ Dish. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
Go here to find the channel for your provider/area:  Keep in mind, broadcast is local only. 
Yes. NBA rules limit the broadcast to the Lakers territory. On the east coast you'd need League Pass to watch the games. 
Negotiations are still on-going w/ Dish. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
Negotiations are still on-going w/ Dish. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
Negotiations are still on-going w/ Dish. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
Cox channel depends on where you are. Go here to get an answer for your area:  
Negotiations are still on-going w/ Dish. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
There are a few providers including Dish with whom negotiations are still on-going. 
Negotiations are still on-going w/ Dish. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
yes, abdominal strain still bothering him. 
NBA rules. Need to order league pass if you don't live in the Lakers local broadcasting footprint. 
Negotiations still on-going with Comcast. You can let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
You can watch tonight's game in HD on DirecTV 691, Fios 578, Uverse 1777, Charter 787 & TWC 403. #GoLakers 
STARTERS: Kobe Bryant, & vs. Dragic, Dudley, Beasley, Scola & Gortat. #GoLakers 
D'Antoni says on that he'll be in the locker room doing physical therapy with Dr. Judy Seto & watching the game on TV tonight. 
Mike D'Antoni to on on how to properly pronounce his last name: "It's DAN-toni, like the apostrophe isn't there." 
Negotiations are still on-going w/ Dish. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
awesome! Always a good time at the fabulous Forum. 
is on 691 and is on 458. 
yes 
super legit 
just that one time? haha 
The new statue & the man of the hour. Congratulations Cap!  What’s your favorite memory of Kareem? 
Check out the statue. RT Ahi esta la estatua del capital  
c'mon, when don't we take care of you guys with the pics? 
it hasn't been unveiled yet 
Jerry West: "Kareem was the most selfless, super play that I've seen in my life." #GoLakers 
Jerry West recounting a story from his rookie year of meeting Kareem at Power HS for the 1st time. "He & I have been friends for 52 years." 
NBA rules limit the broadcast to the local area. Out of market fans can use League Pass to see the games. 
Negotiations are still on-going w/ Dish. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
Pat Riley on "He was our protector. He was the one that carried us." #GoLakers 
Pat Riley: "When it came to "winning time" we used to go "fist up"... and the ball was going to Kareem. Fist up." #GoLakers 
Not at all. RT watching the unveiling of Kareem's statue. Is it weird that Im getting a little misty eyed? 
The statue waiting to be unveiled:  
it's been on since last night 
ICYMI: Yesterday reached an agreement to carry (Ch. 691) and (Ch. 458). 
30 minutes away from the statue unveiling. Catch it live on & #GoLakers  
Today we unveil a statue of Celebrate w/ this wallpaper for your desktop. DOWNLOAD:  |  
4:30pm PT 
yes 
Anyone that gets can watch it. DirecTV, Cox, Fios, Uverse, along with TWC. 
channel 691, check it out 
Yup, live on & at 4:30pm PT RT Will Kareem's statue unveiling be broadcast? If so, where? 
agree, not the easiest situation to step in to and Bernie has done a great job for us. 
still no firm date, Nash will be re-evaluated next week. 
they worked at it during yesterday's practice so there should be elements of it tonight, but it's a process. 
still no firm date, Nash will be re-evaluated next week. 
still no firm date, Nash will be re-evaluated next week. 
Not tonight, targeting Sunday for his 1st game. Bickerstaff will be at the helm again tonight. RT Is D'Antoni coaching tonight?? 
yes rain or shine, the ceremony will be tented if the weather turns. 
.@MagicJohnson, Pat Riley & more will be at the statue unveiling ceremony tonight, you can too:  
Cool triptych of pulling down the alley-oop from Kobe Bryant at today's practice. #PauCanFly #GoLakers  
he's targeting Sunday as his first game to coach. 
Kobe & Dwight at practice today running the 1st of many pick & rolls Lakers Practice Court  
VIDEO: Kobe Bryant on his first day with his new head coach, Mike D'Antoni -  
VIDEO: talks about his 1st practice with Mike D'Antoni -  
Get a behind-the-scenes look at Mike D'Antoni's 1st practice as Lakers head coach in this photo gallery:  
Negotiations still on-going with Comcast. You can let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
D’Antoni taking some portraits with team photographer Andy Bernstein (@ADBPhotoInc) #GoLakers  
D’Antoni talked about how he’s been trying to acquire for 10 years, but it never worked out. “He’s perfect for this system.” 
D’Antoni on “As soon as he gets healthy, I expect him to be unstoppable. There’s no one stopping him.” #GoLakers 
D’Antoni: “I don’t like to call timeouts. The ball should find energy and the ball should find our best players.” #GoLakers 
we’ll have it up later today. 
D’Antoni: “There’s no reason we shouldn’t go off the charts offensively.” Setting a goal of 110-115 points per game. #GoLakers 
D’Antoni said what they did at prac, they’d normally do in Sept. “the good part is that they’re great players, they catch on pretty quick.” 
D’Antoni not expecting to coach tomorrow. Targeting Sunday against the Rockets for his first game on the bench. 
GM Mitch Kupchak & Mike D'Antoni at the podium.  
Press conference for Mike D'Antoni is on now.  
Watch the Mike D'Antoni press conference via our live stream. Press conference set to start in the next few minutes:  
Negotiations are still on-going with Dish. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
.@DirecTV has reached an agreement to carry (Ch. 691) and (Ch. 458). Broadcasts start tonight! 
Here’s a look at the Lakers out on the floor with Mike D’Antoni for the 1st time. #GoLakers  
Here are the D’Antoni brothers reuniting with some of their former players, &  
Mike & Dan D’Antoni came out & met some of the players after signing session. They are currently addressing the whole team in the film room. 
.@DwightHoward signing Sports Illustrated covers:  
.@kaj33 will be honored w/ a 16ft statue outside STAPLES this Friday at 4:30pm PT. The public is invited, info:  
nice! 
It's time to vote for  Does your ballot look like this? Vote Daily!! #GoLakers  
Check out the NEW Lakers Center Court T-shirt w/ this power deal available for $15! Get yours:   
INFOGRAPHIC: Lakers vs. Spurs // FULL SIZE:  | PIC:  
D'Antoni's introductory presser will be streamed live on  We'll let you know when everything gets going tomorrow. 
Mike D'Antoni will be introduced as head coach of the Lakers in a press conference following Thursday's practice at approximately 2 PT. 
Check out the Lakers Prepaid Card. It’s the card real fans carry. Open to SoCal residents in Lakers territory. Details:  
ICYMI: New head coach Mike D'Antoni talked w/ & last night about coming to LA -  #GoLakers 
Photo Gallery from last night's game against the Spurs:  
Dwight: “Pau can hit those shots. I think we lost today with those six points they got off those offensive rebounds.” #GoLakers 
Jordan Hill sprained his right wrist in tonight’s game. He’ll get treatment the next 3 days. Listed as probable for Friday. 
Pau felt good about the shot in the corner after the ball didn’t get to Kobe. A shot he practices regularly, it just didn’t go in this time. 
Pau on how the final play: “We were trying to hit Kobe at the top after he set a back screen on Dwight.” Couldn’t get him the ball. 
Time runs out on the Lakers during their final play as they fall 84-82 to the Spurs. Next up: Phoenix visits on Friday night. #GoLakers 
Danny Green hits a 3 to put SA back up 84-82 with 9.3 seconds left to play. Lakers call a TO & will have the ball. #GoLakers 
Negotiations are still on-going. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
Pau sinks both FTs to give him a dbl-dbl at 10pts & 10rebs and give the Lakers the 80-79 lead with 1:36 remaining. #GoLakers 
7pts in the 4th quarter thus far from #24 ties it back up at 71. 6:38 to go. RT Kobe. Bean. Bryant. 
Spurs surge ahead at the end of the 3rd to take a 1pt lead on the Lakers at 60-59. 12 minutes to play. #GoLakers 
A happy birthday shoutout to on the big board during the last timeout. MWP turns 33 today. #GoLakers  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it. Share your voice:  
VIDEO: Kobe throws it up to Dwight for the flush -  
League Pass has always been blacked out locally. Negotiations are on-going and people are working hard to resolve it. 
Halftime: Lakers 43, Spurs 38. LA has 12 assists on 18 made baskets, led by Kobe's 5 dimes. Holding SA to just 37% shooting. #GoLakers 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are still on-going. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers:  
Negotiations are still on-going and people are working on it. Tell them you want them to carry the Lakers:  
NBA TV and League Pass have always been blacked out locally. Set-up by the NBA to serve out of market fans, but not locally. 
Cox, Verizon, AT&T, Charter & TWC carry the games. Negotiations are on-going w/ others. Share your voice:  
nice seats Leon! 
710 ESPNLA does have all the games. Maybe you caught them at commercial? 
We get your frustration. Negotiations still on-going & people are working to resolve it. Share your voice:  
Lakers bounce back from the slow start to lead 24-18 at the end of the 1st. Kobe hot early, 4/5 FG for 9p, 4a & 3r. #GoLakers 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are still on-going. Not much more can be said so long as the negotiations are still happening. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations still on-going. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations still on-going. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers:  
After starting down 10-2, Lakers go on a 10-0 run as they take back the lead on a Kobe to Dwight oop followed by a Morris FT. 12-10 LA. 
We get your frustration. People are working hard to resolve it. 
Negotiations still on-going with DirecTV. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are still on-going. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are still on-going. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are still on-going. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers:  
Cox, Verizon, AT&T, Charter and TWC carry the games. Negotiations are on-going. Share your voice:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations still on-going. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ DirecTV. People are working to resolve it. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
STARTERS: Kobe Bryant, & vs. Parker, Green, Leonard, Duncan & Splitter. #GoLakers 
TV tonight on & in territory, outside of Lakers territory. Radio: & 1330KWKW. #GoLakers 
With & unavailable tonight, will start at PG. #GoLakers 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going. Let them know you want the Lakers at  
glad you could join us tonight. Have fun on w/ & #GoLakers 
Mike D'Antoni will do his 1st TV interview as head coach of the Lakers tonight at 6:30PT on w/ & 
3 hours until tip vs. the Spurs. RT Staples Center  
"Kobe Bryant on the D'Antoni Hiring" - Full video/story:  #GoLakers 
INJURY UPDATE: Ultrasound on revealed a minor abdominal strain. He won't play tomorrow -  
WATCH: "Lakers Discuss D'Antoni" - the players talk about their new coach.  
Still TBD RT when is the press conference? Or the introduction? 
.@DwightHoward: “You’ve got guys on this team that love to play D & he’s an offensive coach. We’ll find a balance… it’ll be great.” 
.@MettaWorldPeace on D’Antoni’s system: “I think it’s a great system. Lotta open 3s.” Talked about himself & Dwight locking down the D. 
Official Lakers press release on the hiring of Mike D'Antoni:  
#GoLakers Head Coach Mike D'Antoni:  
ICYMI: Last night the Lakers signed Mike D’Antoni to a multi-year deal to be their new head coach:  
Official RT The Lakers have signed coach Mike D'Antoni to a multi-year deal:  It's official. 
Kobe on why he threw the lob to MWP when he said he’s never seen him catch one: “He’s in phenomenal shape & was running like he wanted it.” 
Player of the Game: Dwight Howard: 23pts, 18rebs, 3blks & 2stls.  
FINAL: Lakers 103, Kings 89. Lakers hold Sacramento to 40% shooting from the field. Spurs visit on Tuesday night. #GoLakers 
glad you could join us tonight 
Negotiations still on-going with DirecTV. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
Networks are carried by TWC as well as Verizon Fios, AT&T U-Verse, Cox, Charter and Bright House. 
79-66 Lakers after 3 quarters. Kobe (20p), Dwight (16p), Pau (16p) & Metta (12p) all in double figures. LA holding SAC to just 40% shooting. 
Halftime: Lakers 57, Kings 48. with a dbl-dbl at the half, 14p & 10r. Kobe leads all scorers with 15p. 
Negotiations are still on-going with dish. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
Lakers outscore the Kings 17-8 over the final 5 minutes of the quarter to take a 29-22 lead. 4pts & 2rebs off the bench. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going. Let your provider know you want them to carry the Lakers:  
Charter does carry in southern california, so you should be able to watch the game. Contact charter for questions. 
STARTERS: Kobe Bryant, & vs. Thomas, Evans, Johnson, Outlaw & Thompson. 
.@DwightHoward embracing the stars & stripes headband tonight. & Robert Sacre wearing it too.  
Baron Davis here sitting courtside tonight, chatting up guys pregame.  
.@MettaWorldPeace getting in some 1-on-1 vs. his son.  
see ya soon 
Lakers wearing stars & stripes accessories again tonight in honor of Veterans Day. STAPLES Center  
Won't play tonight against the Lakers. RT Cousins Suspended Two Games:  
Dwight Howard: “We all have one mission, that’s to win the championship.” #GoLakers  
Kobe at the podium:  
Player of the Game: Kobe Bryant: 27p (10/18fg), 9r, 7a & 2 steals.  
FINAL: Lakers 101, Warriors 77. 5 Lakers in dbl-figures, including 2 from the bench: (14p) & (10p). 
Lakers with a 72-55 lead after 3 quarters. Kobe Bryant ups his game leading point total to 22 & adds 8rebs & 6asts to his stat line. 
Then MWP cans a 3 & blows kisses to the crowd. 70-53 LA. RT The first catch-and-shoot 3 from Jodie Meeks swishes home. 
Halftime: Lakers 47, Warriors 38. LA holds GSW to just 32.6% shooting. Kobe leads w/ 13pts (5/9) 4rebs & 5asts. #GoLakers 
it's a good deal 
4pts, 2rebs & a big block on Curry for Hill as he heads to the line. RT Jordan hill is my favorite player for the 
.@dariusmorris4 tallies 7pts off the bench (2/2 from 3) to give the Lakers a 23-22 1st quarter lead. Howard adds 4pts & 5rebs. #GoLakers 
Jodie Meeks & Jordan Hill join Morris, World Peace & Howard. Meeks' first action since the game in Portland on Halloween. #GoLakers 
Last year made a furious comeback in NBA Jam thanks to Andris Biedrins.  Tonight he plays against him. 
Pau Gasol had just 5pts in Wednesday's loss at Utah. He's got 6pts tonight in the early going as the Lakers lead 14-11. #GoLakers 
STARTERS: Kobe Bryant, & vs. Curry, Thompson, Barnes, Lee & Ezeli. #GoLakers 
TV: & RADIO: 
good place to take a break Curtis 
Lakers wearing special shooting shirts for Military Appreciation Night.  
welcome 
Interim head coach Bernie Bickerstaff STAPLES Center  
ICYMI: Here's the full video of GM Mitch Kupchak's press conference discussing the coaching change. -  
New Story by "Kupchak on the Coaching Change" -  
Kobe thoughts on the coaching change on his fb page:  "Tough day. I've seen coaches as well as friends come & go." 
we'll pass along your interest. 
Kupchak: "We couldn't seem to put together a consistent string of offensive & defensive performances." 
Kupchak: "Only yesterday did we come to the decision to make a change." 
Kupchak: "After 5 games we just felt that we weren't winning, weren't seeing improvement & we made a decision." Didn't think it would change 
GM Mitch Kupchak speaking to the media.  
Assistant Coach Bernie Bickerstaff will take over as interim head coach for tonight’s game against the Golden State Warriors. 
OFFICIAL: Lakers Relieve Mike Brown of Head Coaching Duties -  
just 10 hours until tipoff! 
Quote Round-up from Thursday's Practice:  
Currently there is no agreement so we wanted fans to know their options. Negotiations are on-going. 
Here's information on your choices of providers that carry the Lakers on and  
.@SteveNash doing ball handling drills w/ player development coach Phil Handy after practice.  
it's not us 
The Lakers Instagram web profile is up:  Are you following us? 
Photo Gallery:  
Mike Brown: "We didn't play well & had a chance to win when we didn't play well. That's the disappointing thing." 18 more turnovers tonight. 
Kobe's strong 2nd half gives him 29pts on the night, 15 of those from the line. pulls down 7 offensive boards (12 total). 
The Lakers play from behind all night as they fall to the Jazz in Utah 95-86. LA returns home Friday to take on the Warriors. 
Randy Foye's 5th triple of the night pushes the deficit to double digits at 79-68 with 6:38 left to play. 
Lakers cut it to 4 but once again the Jazz finish the quarter on a push & LA trails 65-57 heading into the 4th. Kobe up to 13pts. 
At the half the Lakers trail by 10, 51-41. Dwight Howard leading LA with 11pts & 5rebs. 
League Pass was set up by the NBA to give access to games to out of market fans, it's always been blacked out locally. 
nice! 
appreciate your support 
We get your frustration. You can let your provider know that you want your Lakers this season at  
yup, still the same 
Varies by provider and location, but you can find where is for you here:  
Lakers held the Jazz to just 43% so that helps. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are still on-going with Dish. Let them know you want the Lakers at:  
End of the 1st: Jazz 25, Lakers 17. Lakers got to within a basket but Utah pushed back at the end of the q. LA shoots just 26% (5/19). 
Negotiations are still on-going w/ Dish. You can let Dish know that you want your Lakers at  
appreciate the support from the Pacific Northwest! #GoLakers 
nice 
MWP with a 3 & an emphatic slam in the early going, he's got 6 of the Lakers 12pts but they trail by 5 w/ Kobe heading to the line. 
STARTERS: Kobe Bryant, & vs. Mo Williams, Hayward, Ma. Williams, Millsap & Jefferson 
Time to get it going in Salt Lake. Tune in on & or listen live on #GoLakers 
yup. Channel #1778 in HD. 
that's the plan! 
he's on facebook, but no twitter yet. 
Lakers fans are everywhere! RT fans at Energy Solultions!!! GOOOOOOOOOOO #Lakers  
No Nash tonight. Blake to start, backed up by Morris. 
Lakers hit the road tonight in Salt Lake for a matchup with the Jazz. Tip at 6pm PT on & #GoLakers 
NBA hands out the fines, not us 
New Story from practice: "Lakers Prep For Jazz" -  
WATCH: Kobe talks about playing in Utah & details his health -  
hi 
you don’t get a title in November. Important to be healthy when it matters. 
Kobe: “Hopefully I’ll be 90% tomorrow, put this ankle behind me.” He didn’t practice today but plans to play in Utah.  
pretty amazing group of athletes that we had there on Sunday 
Dwight's working his way back into shape after missing 7 months, he looked great on Sunday didn't he? 
nice! 
Steve Blake has been fined for directing inappropriate language toward a fan. Occurred in 4th Q on Sunday:  
thanks for coming out and seeing us Brenda! 
awesome! 
glad you could make it! 
thanks for coming! 
well done 
awesome! 
Photo gallery from last night's win:  #GoLakers 
PITP 56-34 RT 41 of the Lakers 77 shots came in the restricted area. Pounded the Pistons inside.  
Dwight on what was different tonight: “Energy. We came out tonight with a lot of energy & we hit first.” 
Dwight on the win: “It feels so good. My first win here. It feels good for all of us.” 
Kobe: “I’m not as sore as I was after last game. The good thing is that we have 2.5 days to rest before our game in Utah.” 
always a good night when that’s the result. 
Kobe: “It feels good. We did what we were supposed to do. I think our rhythm was a little bit better.” 
Player of the Game: Dwight Howard - 28pts, 7rebs, 3blks, 2stls #GoLakers  
Mike Brown liked the discipline the team showed w/ spacing & cuts on offense. “I think everyone got a taste of what it could be like.” 
First taco game of the season. #wewanttacos  
Home and away local broadcasts are on and The channel # for the networks depends on your carrier. 
Lakers notch win #1, dropping the Pistons 108-79. Five Lakers score in double-figures. #GoLakers 
Robert Sacre gets his first official points in the NBA with little hook inside on the dish from Chris Duhon. Congrats Rob! 
Jodie Meeks checks in for Kobe Bryant w/ 4:14 left in the game & LA up 99-73. Bryant exits with 15pts, 7rebs & 8asts in 32mins. 
Jordan Hill showing no ill effects of the ankle twist from earlier, ripping down the offensive board & completing the 3-pt play. 91-67 LA. 
Cox just agreed tonight to carry and Details coming soon. 
glad you could join us tonight. How you liking the game so far? 
Negotiations are on-going with DirecTV. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
Negotiations are on-going with DirecTV. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
Lakers starting the 4th quarter with Jamison, & Sacre on the floor. 
Agreement with AT&T U-Verse was reached on 10/27 for Socal viewers. U100 package and above on channel 1777 in HD and 777 in SD 
Jordan HIll w/ the big slam putting the Lakers up 86-55 after 3 quarters. HIll landed awkwardly but was able to finish the quarter. 
Congratulations Heather!! Thanks for coming. RT Center court at the game! #goldenhalftime  
Glad you found the game. 
Negotiations are on-going Comcast. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
Agreement with AT&T U-Verse was reached on 10/27 for Socal viewers. U100 package and above on channel 1777 in HD and 777 in SD 
On in SD on channel 215 and in HD on channel 787 
Agreement with Cox just for Southern CA and Las Vegas. You'll need League Pass to watch the games, per NBA rules 
Sorry, per NBA rules, they can only broadcast locally. Northern CA would need League Pass to watch games. 
Just agreed to deal tonight, details will be coming soon. 
Yes, but you have to be in southern California. Per NBA rules, networks can only show games locally. 
Just for So. CA. Local broadcast agreements only allow the games to be show in that territory, not nationally, per NBA rules. 
Just agreed to a deal tonight. Details will be coming soon. 
Negotiations are on-going with remaining providers. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers:  
Welcome to Cox along with Verizon Fios, AT&T U-Verse and Charter in carrying & 
Some of the Olympians honored include the US women’s water polo team, & 
At halftime tonight the Lakers are honoring all the 2012 Olympic gold medalists who live in Southern California.  
That last bucket gives 20pts (8/9 FG) on the night to go along with 5rebs & 2blks. LA leading 53-30 w/ 2:27 left in the half. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going. Let them know you want them to carry the Lakers:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ DirecTV. People are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
Kobe follows up 3ptr with his 2nd triple of the evening, pushing the Lakers 1st quarter lead to 34-13. #GoLakers 
Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
Lakers bigs being extremely effective as they account for 21 of the team's 25pts thus far (Howard 11, Gasol 10) on 8/10 shooting. Up 25-12. 
Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it. Share your voice:  
Verizon Fios agreed to carry locally. Contact Verizon for channel info. Keep in mind, that's only in SoCal. 
Lakers convert 4 of their first 5 attempts to jump out to the 8-2 lead after 2:19 played. 4pts for #GoLakers 
Negotiations are still on-going w/ DirecTV. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going. Let your provider know you want the Lakers:  

Negotiations are still on w/ DirecTV. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
great seats! #GoLakers 
STARTERS: Kobe Bryant, & vs. Knight, Stuckey, Prince, Maxiel & Monroe. 
Negotiations are still on w/ DirecTV. People are working to resolve it. Let them know you want the Lakers:  
Sunday whites are back for the regular season. Tip-off at 6:30pm PT. #GoLakers  
Good luck Galaxy! RT National anthem... We're minutes away from kickoff! #playlikeachamp  
Lakers take on the tonight at 6:30pm PT. Here's your shootaround preview: -  
Official press release. RT suffered a small lower leg fracture at Portland -  
INFOGRAPHIC: Highlighting the postgame numbers from LAL/LAC in a visual way. LINK:  | PIC:  
.@SteveBlake5: “Im extremely disappointed. It’s not acceptable for us to be losing like this. But we’ll come in & work on it.” 
Kobe: “Just gotta keep on truckin’. I’ve been through these things before. Just gotta continue the process.” 
Kobe: “We’re doing ok offensively… (giving up) too many offensive rebounds & second chance points.” 
Mike Brown: “We play well in stretches…. Then our turnovers. We get bogged down in TOs. 25pts off 20 TOs..” 2nd chance pts also an issue. 
Final: Clippers 105, Lakers 95. Kobe Bryant goes for a game-high 40pts on 14/23 in the loss. Next up, Sunday vs. Detroit at STAPLES Center. 
Quick 6-0 run to start the 4th cuts the lead back to single digits. 82-73, 10:04 to play. #GoLakers 
Lakers get outscored in the 3rd quarter 30-20 & head into the final period down 82-67. Kobe 23pts, Gasol 11rebs. 
Kobe steals the ball from Green for his 1,725 career steal, passing for the most in franchise history. Congratulations #24! 
Halftime: LAC 52, LAL 47. Lakers get only 10 minutes of action from Dwight Howard due to foul trouble. 6/9 from 3 keeping the Lakers in it. 
End of the 1st: Lakers trail 28-23. Kobe Bryant pours in 14pts on 4/7 shooting. 
Tip-off panorama from Section 117 at STAPLES Center:  
he's ready! 
STARTERS: Kobe Bryant, & vs. Paul, Green, Butler, Griffin & Jordan. #GoLakers 
Lakers are ready to tip it off against the Clippers on & ESPN. Listen in on  
Assistant coach Chuck Person breaks down the keys to tonight's game vs. the Clippers w/  
We've pledged $50K to the for Sandy relief. Will match fan contributions up to additional $50K. Donate here:  
nice! 
like we tweeted earlier, Nash is a game-time decision. We'll know more around 6pm when Mike Brown talks to the media. 
what kind of info do you need? 
.@DwightHoward using a jersey a head gear during his post-shootaround media Lakers Practice Court  
Mike Brown says that Steve Nash remains a game-time decision. He didn’t go through shoot around but hasn’t been ruled out. 
New Story on  "Kobe Preaches Patience" -  
“It Makes You Unstoppable” - #KB24  
More Kobe: "Let us work & at the end of the day you'll be happy with the result, as you normally are." WATCH:  
Nash on P&R: “It’s not that it wears me out but I’m not sure right now it should be the focus.” Wants to get the O going & others involved. 
Nash on his shin: “It’s a little sore, luckily it’s nothing structural, just a contusion.” Hopes to play FRI. Officially listed as doubtful. 
Dwight Howard on the offense: “It’s gonna come together & when it does it’s gonna be scary. Just need to be patient.” 
Head coach Mike Brown &@PauGasol breaking down last night’s film after practice.  
Don’t miss a moment. Carmembers can now get exclusive tickets to all of our home games this season!  
Lakers drop to 0-2 on the season, falling 116-106 to the Blazers in Portland despite 33pts (15/19 FTs) 14rebs & 5asts from Dwight Howard. 
Lakers concede a 13-0 run over the final 2:30 and fall behind the Blazers 92-76 after 3. POR has converted 21 Lakers turnovers into 26pts. 
Dwight Howards 29th point of the night cuts the Portland lead to 79-76 with 3:26 left in the 3rd. Kobe up to 21pts including 4/7 from 3. 
Dwight was 3/14 from the line last night. In the 1st half he's 11/14 to go along w/ 4rebs & 4asts. 3/5 from the field for a total of 17pts. 
Turnovers keeping the Lakers from getting into a rhythm on offense & trail 62-57 at the half. Kobe & Dwight w/ 17pts each. Gasol 10pts. 
Locally NBATV is blacked out. Same rules as in the past, NBATV was set up to serve out of market fans, but not preempt local. 
End of 1 down 30-26 to the Blazers. LA shoots over 50% & goes 8/12 from the line but gives the ball away 8 times. Pau w/ 10pts & 3rebs. 
Time Warner, Verizon, Charter and AT&T have the networks. Let your provider know you want the Lakers at  
We get your frustration. You can let your provider know that you want your Lakers this season at  
Locally NBATV is blacked out. Same rules as in the past, NBATV was set up to serve out of market fans, but not preempt local. 
Time Warner, Verizon, Charter and AT&T have the networks. Let your provider know you want the Lakers at  
Melvin is getting it done at the Rose Garden tonight!! #GoLakers RT represent!  
oh wow, and the Ultimate Warrior facepaint... big time! 
awesome! Keep supporting the purple & gold! #GoLakers 
Locally NBATV is blacked out. Same rules as in the past, NBATV was set up to serve out of market fans, but not preempt local. 
Same rules as in the past, NBATV and League Pass were set up by the NBA to serve out of market fans. 
Time Warner Cable Sports is on channel 403 on Time Warner Cable. 
Locally NBATV is blacked out. Same rules as in the past, NBATV was set up to serve out of market fans, but not preempt local. 
Blazers opted for their new alternate red unis. Home team gets the option. RT why aren't they wearing the purple jersey's 
We get your frustration. You can let your provider know that you want your Lakers this season at  
403 
We get your frustration. You can let your provider know that you want your Lakers this season at  
578 
Locally NBATV is blacked out. Same rules as in the past, NBATV was set up to serve out of market fans, but not preempt local. 
STARTERS: Kobe Bryant, & vs. Lillard, Matthews, Batum, Aldridge & Hickson. #GoLakers 
Time Warner, Verizon, Charter and AT&T have the networks. Let your provider know you want the Lakers at  
Deal only affects local broacasts. In Portland you'll need League Pass or League Pass Broadband, just like past seasons. 
Time Warner, Verizon, Charter and AT&T have the networks. Let your provider know at  
We get your frustration. Best thing you can do is to make your voice heard:  
Game time in Portland. In LA tune in on & everywhere else check out Or tune in on #GoLakers 
Talks will continue. Best thing you can do now is make your voice heard via  
Locally NBATV is blacked out. Same rules as in the past, NBATV was set up to serve out of market fans, but not preempt local. 
Both sides are talking. Best thing you can do now is to let them know you want them to carry the Lakers at  
Agreement is for local broadcasts only. In Yonkers you'll need to get League Pass or League Pass Broadband. 
thanks 
The latest update from the organization on the distribution of &  
that's dedication! #GoLakers 
best of luck 
INFOGRAPHIC: Take a unique look at some of last night's postgame numbers.  
VIDEO: Steve Nash talks about the decisions that dictate his role in the offense & how to improve it -  
PHOTO GALLERY:  
Dwight Howard: “just because we have a talented team it’s not gonna just click. It takes time… just gotta continue to stay focused.” 
Steve Nash called the O “a work in progress.” Has to balance the option of running P&R & the Princeton on every possession. Will get better. 
Pau Gasol: “We have to remember that we need to be solid defensively, no matter what happens on the other end.” 
Q. Did we see the offense tonight as it should be run? Mike Brown: “No. You saw bits & pieces of it. Especially early on.” 
Mike Brown: “I thought we didn’t give the multiple effort to defend the pick n’ roll.” P&R & transition defense lacking tonight. 
Mike Brown: “there was a stretch beginning after our 2nd unit went on a little run that we started to falter… the ball stopped.” 
FINAL: Mavs 99, Lakers 91. The team will head straight to the airport & fly to Portland for tomorrow night's matchup with the Blazers. 
Lakers trail 86-73 as the starting lineup returns to the floor. Nash, Bryant, Jamison, Gasol & Howard, 8:50 left to play. 
Lakers D struggles in the 3rd as they lose the quarter 26-20 & fall behind 74-66 heading into the 4th. 
ICYMI: Opening Night 2012 Drop Cloth Video & Intros  #LALOpeningNight 
Lakers trail at the half 48-46 despite shooting 56% from the field. Gasol's 12pts & 6rebs lead LA. Kobe adds 10pts, Howard 9pts & 5rebs. 
Bank is open as Michael here nails a 3 off the backboard to win $5K for the Lakers Youth Foundation.  
As noted by the Lakers have 10 assists on their 13 made baskets. LA shoots 59% & leads 29-25 after the 1st. 
Jamison finds a cutting for the easy dunk. 2nd unit + Gasol has increased the lead to 29-23 in their 2 mins on the floor. 
.@SteveBlake5 enters for at the 3:09 mark. Nash's 1st action yields 5pts on 2/2 shooting & a pretty assist to Pau. 19-18 LA. 
 - Kobe's opening address to the STAPLES Center crowd: "Let's get this party started, enjoy the show." 
#LakersBasketballIsBack #LALOpeningNight 
Jeffrey Osborne on hand to sing the opening night national anthem for the 28th time. #LALOpeningNight #Tradition 
STARTERS: Kobe Bryant, & vs. Collison, Mayo, Marion, Brand & Wright. #LALOpeningNight 
Tonight's game can be seen on TNT after the MIA/BOS game or listen in on & NBA League Pass Audio. #LALOpeningNight 
Dwight leads them out, big cheers for Kobe as he brings up the rear. Lakers are on the floor. #LALOpeningNight  
thanks for following 
dad's got talent 
awesome! Tell her we say hello! 
gotta start 'em early! 
dig it 
precious. Gotta start them early! 
nice 
haha nice 
boom 
glad to have ya with us 
well done 
not bad at all 
sweet 
stayin comfy! 
Bane Mamba! 
sweet 
definitely! 
dig it 
nice 
awesome! Love the support from the Netherlands! 
nice 
sweet 
nice! 
awesome family team work! 
not bad 
nice 
there ya go 
Wearing the Kobe jersey, but looking like 
nice! 
Where is everyone watching #LALOpeningNight? Who's got their Lakers gear on? Send us some pics!! 
November 27th. Bring gently used or new books to donate in memory of Chick Hearn. Follow for more. 
 - warming up in the post with some right & left handed hooks. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ Cox. You can let your provider know that you want your Lakers this season at  
Negotiations are on-going w/ Dish. You can let your provider know that you want your Lakers this season at  
1 hour to go. #LALOpeningNight 
.@MettaWorldPeace warms up w/ while & prepare for their pregame hit.  
 - draining shots from the top pregame. 
2 hours to go. #LALOpeningNight 
Are YOU Ready?  This video by will get you in the right frame of mind for tip off. #LALOpeningNight 
3 hours to go. #LALOpeningNight 
#LALOpeningNight The 1st thing the opposing team sees as they get off the bus underneath STAPLES Center  
Today's shootaround preview RT Chuck Person breaks down tonight's matchup vs Dallas -  
ARE YOU READY Lakers fans? Gear up with NEW arrivals  & TEAM LA!  
6 hours to go. #LALOpeningNight 
Kobe Bryant said he was able to participate fully in shootaround this morning and WILL play tonight against the Mavs.  
The journey begins tonight at 7:30pm PT on TNT. #GoLakers #LALOpeningNight  
NEW STORY: "Training Camp Wrap with Mitch Kupchak" -  sits down w/ the GM. 
12 hours to go. #LALOpeningNight 
TNT game tomorrow night 
awesome! 
24 hours to go. #LALOpeningNight 
Spruce up your desktop with the October/November schedule wallpaper. DOWNLOAD:  PIC:  
As of right now Brown expects to play tomorrow. RT What about Jordan Hill? Will He play tomorrow? 
Brown: “Our defense is probably further ahead but it doesn’t show all the time because of our offense.” Turnovers on O hurting the D. 
Kobe Bryant will be a game time decision for the opener against the Mavs according to head coach Mike Brown. 
Finishing up the final practice before the opener.  
HOT OFF THE PRESSES: the 2012-13 Lakers media guide. Starting 5 on the cover.  
"Through the Lens of World Peace" -  grabs the camera before the game in SD. 
New Story: "Kobe a Question Mark as Opener Nears" -  We'll know more after this afternoon's practice. 
Almost time. RT Closing in on 35 hrs until season opener. Bout to be the best day of the year  
Negotiations are still on-going w/ other carriers. You can let your provider know that you want your Lakers at  
AT&T U-Verse has reached an agreement to distribute and Complete details:  
Press release: Lakers Waive Andrew Goudelock:  
Verizon Fios has reached an agreement to distribute and Details coming in the next few days. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ other carriers. You can let your provider know that you want your Lakers this season at  
Charter has reached an agreement to distribute and in Southern California  
That's a fine looking laptop. 
Dwight Howard: “We gotta remember that we’re playing for June & there’s a learning curve… don’t get frustrated.” 
Mike Brown: “It’s the turnover game that’s killing us.” Team watched all the TOs from the LAC game & the last SAC game before tip. 
.@DwightHoward tossed his jersey to this lucky fan as he headed to the locker room tonight.  
Like every other team in the NBA, the Lakers are 0-0. Games start to count Tuesday night. 
Lakers close out their preseason w/ a 94-82 loss to the Kings in San Diego. Regular season tips off Tuesday night at STAPLES vs. Dallas. 
Halftime: Kings 40, Lakers 39. Jodie Meeks puts in 6pts & grabs 4rebs off the bench. LA shoots just 39% but holds SAC to 38%. 
glad you could join us! 
Sweet pic from the catwalk here in San Diego by team photographer Noah Graham.  
Huddled up.  
End of the 1st Lakers trailing 30-18. 
Jodie Meeks entering for Ebanks. Jamison in for Metta. Jordan Hill comes in for Dwight. 6pts, 6rebs & a block for Howard. 
They sponsor the building in San Diego. Lakers logo is center court at STAPLES. 
Negotiations are still on-going w/ DirecTV & people are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
STARTERS: Nash, Ebanks, World Peace, Gasol & Howard. TV: & RADIO: 
Negotiations are still on-going w/ DirecTV. You can let your provider know that you want your Lakers at  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working on it. Share your voice:  
Mike Brown confirms that Dwight Howard will play tonight. Kobe Bryant got treatment at home but didn't make the bus ride down. 
Dwight Howard & Jordan Hill arriving in San Diego.  
Down south tonight. RT SD is ready for last preseason game. Logo in place w purple & gold key  
Postgame Numbers:  
Photos from last night's game:  
Turnovers do in the Lakers as they fall 97-91. Final preseason tuneup tomorrow night in SD vs. the Kings at 7pm PT on 
Steve Nash's first time wearing the purple road uni, what'd you think?  
Not exclusive to TWC. Networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. People are working to resolve this. 
Just rest after his first game back. 
HALFTIME: 49-40 Clippers. Jordan Hill with 6pts & 5rebs in 12:35 in his first game back after missing the previous 5. 
End of the 1st Lakers up 23-22. Strong performance by Robert Sacre in Howard's stead, 6pts & 2rebs. LAL shoot 53%. 
League Pass doesn't show games until the regular season. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ DirecTV. You can let your provider know that you want your Lakers at  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it. Share your voice:  
STARTERS: Nash, Meeks, World Peace, Gasol & Sacre. Jordan Hill back after missing 5gms. Bryant (foot) & Howard (rest) out tonight. 
Negotiations are on-going with U-Verse & people are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
5 minutes from tip vs. the Clippers on & Listen in on 
Lord Stanley paid a visit to the Lakers Sunday. Thanks for sharing  
"One New King of the West" & are featured on the latest cover of   
VIDEO: Kobe talks about his injured foot & his availability for tomorrow's game against the Clippers -  
VIDEO: Mike Brown talks after today's practice -  
The latest on Kobe's foot, Dwight practicing & the possible return of Jordan Hill from  
Mike Brown & Eddie Jordan going over offensive sets w/ the team between 5-on-5 action at the end of practice today.  
Building team chemistry.  
OFFICIAL: Lakers waive Chris Douglas-Roberts & Greg Somogyi. The roster now stands at 16.  
clever 
Fill in the blank: "KB24 + D12 = ______"  
Dwight answering multiple questions on his back with, “it’s pretty good.” Said it feels fine even after the fall & 33 minutes of play. 
Kobe on how it was playing with Dwight for the 1st time: “Amazing” 
Mike Brown highlighted Dwight’s activity & defensive presence in his debut while shaking off the rust. Didn’t like 2nd unit’s defense. 
4 Lakers starters score in double figures but they fall to the Kings 99-92. went for 19p 12r & 5blks in his debut. 
Mike Brown brings Nash & Howard back w/ 8:46 remaining to join Ebanks, Jamison & Meeks. LAL down 80-75. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. 
Starters come back for the final 7 mins of the 2nd & turn a 1pt deficit into an 11pt lead. 57-46 LA. Kobe w/ 13pts after the buzzer beater. 
Retired for Wilt Chamberlain. Chose #10 because of his love of soccer. RT Why is Steve Nash not No. 13? 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. 
Crowd still buzzing over the Kobe-Dwight oop RT Showtime LA #GoLakers 
On tonight. During the regular season, League Pass. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ Verizon. People are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
It's 29-28 Lakers after the 1st quarter. Howard plays 7:35, tallying 4p, 2r & 2blks. LA shoots 60% from the field. 
We get your frustration.Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
We get your frustration.Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
The Lakers new starting 5 being introduced for the 1st time:  How do you like it? 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it. Share your voice:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working on it. Share your voice:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard on it. Share your voice:  
On & tonight and also NBA TV 
STARTERS: Kobe Bryant, & TV: & RADIO: 
Tip-off at 630pm PT. 
Lakers playing pranks on the new guy, letting run on to the floor solo while they laughed in the tunnel.  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working on it. Share your voice:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it. Share your voice:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. 
 - Dwight working in the post, sinking lefty hooks over assistant coach Darvin Ham. 
Brown said Jordan Hill looked good in practice yesterday but it being a medical issue, it’s Gary Vitti’s call as to when Hill returns. 
Brown will get the starters into their regular rotations & have them finish the game for the first time this preseason. 
Tonight is the first time the Lakers coaching staff has game planned this preseason. Previously just trying to get guys game action & looks. 
Head coach Mike Brown on playing “I have no minute restrictions.” Starters minutes will be stretched out tonight. 
Dwight warming up:  
Official press release on the waiving of Ronnie Aguilar & Reeves Nelson:  
Highlights from last night's game,  and postgame interviews,  incl. a update from 
Kobe led with 22p on 7-12 FG's, Pau with 20p on 8-15. Ebanks with the spark off the bench, scoring 20p incl. 4-5 from 3. Nash 8p, 6a 
Lakers fall to 0-5 in the preseason, losing in Las Vegas to the Kings 103-98. Teams meet again on Sunday at 6:30pm at STAPLES Center. 
Still trailing by 7, the have been led in the 4th by who hit two more from 3 point land to take his total to 17pts. 
That's dedication 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. 
The action gets a bit frantic and at the end of 3 it's 81-75 Kings. Kobe now with 22 and Pau with 20. 
50-46 at the half, trailing. hit a 3 to close out the half, but team still shooting 38.9% thus far. 
Locally on Not just on Time Warner Cable. The networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. 
27-20 after the 1st. Kobe w/ 9 and w/ 6. Early time for Goudelock, and CDR 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
2:37 left in the first and the trail the 18-16. Lakers shooting .333, but 8-10 from the line. 
.@TWCSportsNet can only show games locally, per NBA rules. To see games where you are, you'd need League Pass. 
We work with Ticket Exchange on the secondary ticket market, or you can see if tickets are available through Ticketmaster. 
Networks only broadcast locally, per NBA rules. You'd need League Pass to view intl, but League Pass doesn't show preseason. 
League Pass only. TV is limited local broadcast area. However, League Pass doesn't show preseason games. 
Not tonight. Currently, listed as day-to-day so no date is set. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it. Share your voice:  
Game on. STARTERS: Bryant, & Sacre. TV: & RADIO: 
Love the support from the Blue Grass State. 
Mitch Kupchak statement on the passing of Minneapolis Lakers and Hall of Fame guard Slater Martin:  
Not playing tonight. Still listed as day-to-day. 
Preseason Game 5: vs at 7:00pm PT in Las Vegas. TV: & Radio: & 1330 KWKW 
dope 
Lakers have Wednesday off. Report back Thursday for practice before the flight to Vegas. #LakersCamp  
“On the practice court & in games, all the time we spend together is important.” - Nash on building team chemistry. 
Final: Jazz 114, Lakers 80. Next game will be in Las Vegas on Friday against the Sacramento Kings. 
Worldwide RT they know about us in Paris  
Kobe goes into Mamba mode in the 3rd: 9/11 shooting for 23pts (up to 31 on the night) but the Lakers still trail 88-56 heading into the 4th. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it. Share your voice:  
Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Steve Blake starting the second half with Kobe, Metta, Antawn & Sacre. Looks like Nash's night is done. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ DirecTV. You can let your provider know that you want your Lakers this season at  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
Agreement is for local broadcasts only. Per NBA rules, limited to showing games to the local area, not nationally. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going with U-Verse & people are working hard to resolve it. 
2nd unit struggling so far this quarter. Brown bringing back the starting 5 w/ Duhon in place of Nash. 39-22 Jazz. 
Lakers starting the 2nd with a lineup of Jodie Meeks, Reeves Nelson & Ronnie Aguilar. 
Jazz end the quarter on a 15-3 run to take a 26-15 lead after the 1st. Lakers shoot just 4/15 from the field. 
Won't just be on TWC. The networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. More info:  
TWCSportsNet is for local broadcasts only, per NBA rules, limited territory where the broadcasts can be seen. 
come see us!! 
STARTERS: Bryant, Jamison & Sacre. TV: & RADIO: 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ DirecTV. You can let your provider know that you want your Lakers at  
Sorry, just broadcast locally. No natl broadcasters for the game and NBA League Pass doesn't start until the regular season. 
Not tonight. RT is playing?!? 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
.@paugasol & arriving in Anaheim. Tip off at 7pm PT.  
Negotiations are on-going w/ DirecTV. You can let your provider know you want your Lakers this season at  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it. Share your voice:  
We’re here in Anaheim tonight. Who’s coming to see us?  
We’re here in Anaheim tonight. Who’s coming to see us?  
7pm tip in Anaheim tonight vs. the Jazz. RT See you guys tonight in Anaheim! Can't wait! #Lakers 
see ya soon! 
appreciate the long distance support! Go Lakers! 
our pleasure, it was a pretty fun comeback by the purple squad. 
what'd you think? 
New Story: "Metta World Peace Rounding Into Form" -  
Check out highlights from today's end of practice 5-on-5 game:  #LakersCamp 
Brown on Dwight as a leader: “I think by nature he’s a vocal guy… he’s very charismatic. One thing he does do is talk on the floor.” 
it was. Kobe being Kobe. We’ll get video up on the site later. 
Brown talking about the stages of camp. Still more important to see different guys in game situations than winning in the preseason. 
we’ll have video up on the site later. Players still doing post practice media. 
took a job at Arizona State 
Jamison find Nash underneath for the layup as time runs down to seal the win for purple: 24-19. Game over.  
Nash creates through the lane for the jumper, purple up 20-16. Meeks answers with a 3. 20-19. More Kobe pushes it to 22-19 purple. 30 secs. 
Kobe at the right elbow unguarded puts purple up two. 2 minutes to go. 
3 minutes of OT. Blake, Meeks, Goudelock, Gasol & Howard for white. Nash, Bryant, Metta, Jamison & Sacre for purple. Dwight wins the tip. 
Purple gets the stop, Nash dishes to Jamsion but it won’t go at the buzzer. Bonus b-ball. Team huddled up before OT.  
Dwight makes 1/2 from the line. Jamison answers w/ a triple to tie it at 16. 25 seconds left. 
Purple subbed in Jamison for Somogyi. Goudelock in for white. White cuts the lead to 15-13 w/ a minute left after Kobe’s turnaround J. 
5-on-5: Nash, Bryant, World Peace, Somogyi & Sacre vs. Blake, Meeks, Ebanks, Gasol & Howard. #LakersCamp  
indefinitely as in they haven’t determined a time table yet 
From Lakers PR: Earl Clark has a strained left groin and is out indefinitely. 
Taking care of more media obligations before starting practice today.  
Off day Sunday. Team will meet back at the facility Monday morning. #LakersCamp  
Photos from tonight's game vs. the Jazz:  
Kobe: “I can play off of the ball so much more... With Steve handling the ball it frees me up to cut behind the defense." 
Pau Gasol on his locker neighbor Sacre: “He’s playing really well. He’s worked really hard and he’s really been helping us.” 
Turiaf, currently in China with the Clippers, offered to let Sacre use his car while he’s out of the country. 
Rookie Robert Sacre recounting his 1st trip to STAPLES Center to watch fellow Gonzaga alum Ronny Turiaf play a couple years ago. 
Kobe: “I thought we executed well. We read one another, which is the key.” Continued improvement in execution the focus for preseason. 
Preseason is a good chance for non local fans to get to see the Lakers. This season games in Fresno, Ontario, Anaheim, SD and LV. 
Lakers drop this one 99-86 to the Utah Jazz. Next preseason game is Tuesday night in Anaheim vs. the Jazz. 
NBA League Pass is blacked out locally, same rules as past seasons. It was designed to serve out of market fans. 
Not just on Time Warner Cable. Networks are available to all carriers, negotiations on-going. More info:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ Verizon. People are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ UVerse to carry the networks. People are working hard to resolve it. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it.Share your voice:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ DirecTV. People are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
The agreement w/ Time Warner Cable Sports is for local broadcasts. All the national and international options are unchanged. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ DirecTV. People are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working on it. Share your voice:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it. Share your voice:  
Home and away games will be on & this season. Visit  for more info. 
Not just on Time Warner Cable. The networks are available to all carriers, negotiations on-going. More info:  
NBA League Pass is blacked out locally, same as it has always been. It was designed for out of market fans. 
Lakers close out the 2nd quarter on a 15-5 run to take a 46-35 halftime lead. Kobe tallies 17pts, 11 of those coming from the line. 
That's pretty much it. You can find more details via  since they run League Pass for all the teams. 
Deal is for local broadcasts only, so available for intl. Use League Pass for intl viewing, but doesn't work in preseason. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ UVerse, so no channel info yet. You can let them know you want the Lakers at  
An agreement has been reached w/ Bright House Networks (Bakersfield area). Other negotiations on-going, working hard to on this. 
Lakers finish the 1st quarter up 25-22 over the Jazz. Kobe goes for 7pts (3/4) & 4rebs. Rookie Robert Sacre grabs 6 boards. 
glad you approve! 
STARTERS: Nash, Bryant, World Peace, Gasol & Sacre. TV: & Radio on AM690 tonight until 710 kicks in after USC. 
NEW STORY: "Darius Morris To Receive Backup Minutes" -  
.@SteveNash just nailed 16 straight runners during warmups.  
Blake is fine, Brown is just trying to get other guys minutes during the preseason. RT is steve blake injured? 
Today’s shoot around went the normal hour as opposed to Wednesday’s 3 hour session. “All the vets were happy” -@dariusmorris4 
No Jordan Hill or Dwight Howard tonight. Brown also said that he would probably hold Steve Blake out as well. 
Expect to get more minutes tonight as the backup PG as coach Brown continues to take looks at guys during the preseason. 
pretty awesome! 
Nope, not playing tonight. Just getting work in pregame. RT Is gonna play tonight vs the Jazz? 
.@DwightHoward out on the STAPLES Center floor.  
see ya soon 
yes, both teams stay in their respective locker rooms 
The locker room at STAPLES Center dressed & waiting for the players to arrive for the 1st time this season.  
awesome! 
Tonight's radio info. RT Because of USC football, we start on 690 AM and will move over to 710 AM once USC is over. 
More photos of the #NewLakersCourt here:  What does everything think of the new look? 
WATCH: We put together a time lapse video of the new court being laid down for the 1st time at STAPLES -  
#NewLakersCourt takes a cue from soccer w/ a star representing each title at center court. STAPLES Center  
You follow us here on twitter, now you can see our handle on the #NewLakersCourt STAPLES Center  
We've changed up the look along the baseline on the #NewLakersCourt STAPLES Center  
networks are being made available to all carriers. Negotiations are on-going. Visit  to make your voice heard. 
networks are being made available to all carriers. Negotiations are on-going. Visit  to make your voice heard. 
we appreciate your support as well Madelyn 
you're cool too Gaby 
good stuff! 
good to have you back 
That's dedication. RT Do u think this person is a #LakersFan? Idk. I need one more flag to be convinced.  
Magic’s the best 
that’s not a bad idea. 
More pics of the new floor coming tomorrow. Stay tuned to our Instagram. RT more pics of the new floor please! 
Our secondary logo is now featured on the floor. RT if you like it! #NewLakersCourt STAPLES Center  
WATCH: Kobe talks about how his shoulder is feeling, "It feels good, strong" -  
Lakers finishing up Friday’s practice session with their normal free throw work.  
Yesterday rookie Robert Sacre & battled in the paint w/ Here's how it went:  
A new Lakers floor is going down at STAPLES for the 1st time today. Follow our Instagram for more pics.  
What'd you guys think? RT My Homie sent me this pic Does this look like me? Lol #2K13  
networks are being made available to all carriers. Negotiations are on-going. Visit  make your voice heard 
You're in for a long day when you're trying to battle Dwight Howard for position in the post.  
WATCH: Dwight Howard talks about the extra work he did against the bigs today & how he discovered his back injury -  
great seats! 
.@DwightHoward bodying up the other bigs after practice today. Here vs.  
The gym today:  
Highlights from last night's game in Ontario:  
it’s a fun trip every preseason. 
Brown expects to keep stretching the starters minutes into the 2nd half of games & eventually go to a more season like rotation. 
Mike Brown didn’t like the gambling for steals early in tonight’s game: “Every time we gambled it seemed like they scored on us.” 
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
Here's a mini photo gallery from tonight's game:  More to come later. 
That's a wrap from Ontario, Lakers fall to the Blazers 93-75. Another solid outing from the 1st unit sans Kobe & Dwight. Next game Saturday. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it. Share your voice:  
Not yet on DirecTV, negotiations on-going and people are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
Chris Duhon & enter the Lakers lineup. Somogyi is new to twitter, make him feel welcome. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working on it. Share your voice:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working on it. Share your voice:  
Steve Nash is up to 13p (6/9), 4a, 4r & 2 steals but the Lakers trail 73-62 after 3qtrs. Everyone enjoying the Lakers new #10? 
Steve Nash hanging in the 2nd row.  
Pic from the huddle.  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
Steve Nash (7p, 4a) rights the offensive ship in the 2nd quarter and the Lakers are tied at 44 heading into the halftime locker room. 
Assistant coach Eddie Jordan took the 1st shift in the huddle during the timeout talking offense before Mike Brown came in to talk D. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ AT&T. You can let your provider know that you want your Lakers at  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it. Share your voice:  
applause is usually an indicator of approval. 
Kobe & Dwight walked out from the locker room together to a thunderous applause from the Ontario crowd.  
not playing tonight, shoulder injury. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working on it. Share your voice:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working on it. Share your voice:  
Not on DirecTV since negotiations are on-going for them to carry Make your voice heard:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Share your voice:  
Not on DirecTV since negotiations are on-going for them to carry Make your voice heard:  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
We appreciate you taking the time. 
Pau & Metta go for 6pts each but the Lakers trail 25-21 after the 1st quarter. 
follow he'll take care of ya on that front 
Excepting those that are national exclusives, yes. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it. Share your voice:  
Preseason games tend to start at 7pm, but not all. In the regular season it will be the normal 7:30, except on Sunday. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it. Share your voice:  
preseason games only. Still a normal 7:30 start time for regular season games. Check  for exact times. 
Your frustration is understandable, but negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard on it. Make your voice heard:  
Starters tonight: Steve Nash, Jodie Meeks, Metta World Peace, Pau Gasol & Robert Sacre. 
Your frustration is understandable, but negotiations are still on-going, people are working hard to get a deal done. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going with DirecTV. Make your voice heard:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard on it. Make your voice heard:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to reach agreements. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ Cox. Let your provider know that you want your Lakers this season at  
Tonight's game is being broadcast live on & If you can't catch it on TV tune in to w/ 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working on it. Make your voice heard:  
Broadcasters & have got you covered on the espanol side of things. Give them a follow.  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
Dwight Howard getting work in on the court w/ Darvin Ham pregame.  
Your frustration is understandable, but negotiations are still on-going, people are working hard to get a deal done. 
We get your sadness. Negotiations are on-going & people are working on this. Make your voice heard:  
Thanks for taking the time to make your voice heard. It's standard negotiations, but we know it's tough waiting for a deal. 
The new network is for local broadcasts only. In Cleveland you would need League Pass to watch the games. 
We get your frustration. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard on it. Make your voice heard:  
glad you could make it! 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Brown stressing the same things he talked about after the Fresno game: don’t gamble for steals, transition D, full speed pace on offense. 
Mike Brown indicates that Kobe wanted to play tonight but the team is holding him out. Jodie Meeks likely to start in his place. 
The logo down on the floor in Ontario. #LakersCamp  
Here’s where we’re playing tonight in Ontario (California, not Canada for those asking). Who’s coming to see  
A big thanks to the 400K people that are following us on Instagram. If you're not one of them, you can find us as 'lakers' over there too. 
Lakers are back in action tonight against in Ontario. Tip at 7pm PT on & 
Great cake! Happy Birthday! 
PHOTO GALLERY:  More photos of Tuesday's practice in El Segundo. 
Dwight was out there, on the same team as Kobe though, so no way he could dunk on him. Sets the pick on the 2nd dunk. 
that's Antawn, not Dwight 
You saw the pic ( now check out video of Kobe throwing down:  Who mentioned the R (retire) word? 
Rifleman vs. Mamba:  (Spoiler alert: it didn't end well for Chuck) 
Jordan Hill on his back injury: "Nothing too major, just trying to be careful with it." WATCH:  
Pic:  RT Kobe, w/ a grin, said dunk over/around Jamison was payback for taking a charge earlier. 
Kobe going through extra dribbling drills w/ Phil Handy after practice.  
Dwight Howard boxing out Robert Sacre during 5-on-5 action.  
According to Lakers PR man John Black, has been cleared for 5-on-5 full court work, with limited minutes. #LakersCamp 
Weren't able to be in Fresno? Get a feel for what it was like at Steve Nash's 1st Lakers game w/ Full Court Press:  
awesome! 
INJURY UPDATE:  was diagnosed today w/ a herniated disc.. He'll be re-evaluated in a week. 
Ontario, California, not Ontario, Canada. Just about 40 miles from LA. 
1st off day of camp today so we're taking a look back at the sights & sounds of last Monday's Media Day circus:  
Ours too RT Seeing in a uniform just brings a smile to my face. 
From the Locker Room: Steve Nash talks about his chemistry w/ Kobe & his role -  
WATCH: Head coach Mike Brown talks about the 1st units success & what improvements he's looking for -  
.@MettaWorldPeace slimmed down this offseason & it's helping him on both ends of the floor. WATCH:  
Couldn't be in Fresno last night? Check out the highlights:  
it's that time of year 
PHOTO GALLERY:  Check out photos from the Lakers first game of the preseason. 
glad you had a good time 
Nash on his chemistry w/ Kobe: “It felt pretty good. I only think its going to get better. I can’t complain about that part of the game.” 
Brown on Nash: “Steve just created easy shots for everybody. He made Sacre look like he’s in his 3rd year in the league.” 
Mike Brown liked how the 1st unit looked. Transition D only real negative from the starters. Not worried about the big run vs. the 2nd unit. 
We understand your frustration. Negotiations are on-going. You can make you voice heard at  
Negotiations are on-going carriers including Verizon. You can also make your voice heard:  
Lakers fall 110-83 after holding a 7pt halftime lead as the starters rest the entire 2nd half. Next game is Weds in Ontario vs. POR. 
Negotiations are on-going carriers including UVerse. You can also make your voice heard:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
Negotiations are on-going to get the networks on all the providers. You can also make your voice heard:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ DirecTV. You can let your provider know you want your Lakers this season at  
National games are unaffected by the agreement. Will still have the full allotment of games on national TV 
On & Visit  for more info. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Jodie Meeks & Earl Clark make their 1st appearances of the evening replacing Hill & Ebanks. LA trails 70-66. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ carriers incl UVerse & people are working hard. Make your voice heard:  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
We understand the frustration. Negotiations are on-going. You can make you voice heard at  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
Cheers of “YEAH MOGI” ring out from the bench, led by Dwight Howard, after #55 Greg Somogyi’s big block. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Channel 403 in HD, go to  and go to What's On for SD channel info. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Dwight Howard is here in Fresno supporting the team even though he can't play.  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers. Let your provider know you want them to carry the Lakers:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. 
Steve Nash played 14:35 in the 1st half & finished 2/3 from the field for 5pts, 3asts, 1reb & no turnovers. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Sorry for the lack of tweets, spotty internet at the arena. Kobe & Metta lead w/ 10pts each. Pau adds 9pts. Jordan Hill 6pts off the bench. 
Not just on TWC. The networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. For more info:  
Lakers 56-49 at the half. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
is channel 403. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
We understand, negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to get it done. Make your voice heard:  
Not just on TWC. The networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. More info:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers including Comcast. Make your voice heard:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
Brown brings Pau, Kobe & Metta back in w/9:11 to play & LA leading 31-21. They join Somogyi & Blake. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Not just on TWC. The networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. For more info:  
We understand your frustrations, negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to get it done. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
.@paugasol leads the way w/ 8pts & Kobe adds 6 as the Lakers jump out to a 26-17 1st quarter lead. Nash had 2asts in his 7mins. 
On AM 690 due to baseball playoffs. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Not just on TWC. The networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. For more info:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Brown goes to his bench with 4:43 remaining in the 1st. Jamison & Blake enter for World Peace & Blake. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
Negotiations on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Negotiations on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Pau Gasol wins the tip to Steve Nash and the 2012-13 season is under way. 
STARTERS: Kobe Bryant, & Robert Sacre. 
Not just on TWC. The networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. More info  
Negotiations are still on-going. Let your provider know that you want your Lakers this season at  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
Your frustration is understandable, but negotiations are on-goin. Make your voice heard:  
Your frustration is understandable. Negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to resolve it. Let your provider know. 
Tipoff 5 minutes away on & Listen in on 
Kobe & the team heading out of the locker room.  
League Pass rules are unchanged due to the deal. League Pass is regular season and playoffs, don't think preseason is covered. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
Will let the tech folks know to look into it. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Tough to have more to say as long as negotiations are still on-going. But they are working hard to get full distribution. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers and people are working hard to resolve it. For more info:  
Heard that a few times, but working fine when I test. Here's the full link:  
Huge ovation from the fans that are here early as runs onto the floor for warmups. 
Local broadcast only. NBA TV only picks up some games. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers incl. UVerse. Make your voice heard:  
Yup. On & tonight. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Your frustration is understandable, but negotiations are on-going. Make your voice heard:  
Antawn warming up. 1 hour until tip. #LakersCamp  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
No streaming online unless your carrier has the networks. 
Not just on TWC. The networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. For more info:  
We get your frustrations, Negotiations are on-going. Let your provider know that you want your Lakers at  
AM 710 ESPN is our radio broadcast partner. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard. Make your voice heard:  
Negotiations are on-going. Let your provider know that you want your Lakers this season at  
Not really appropriate to guess since negotiations are on-going. We are committed to getting full distribution. 
Not just on TWC. The networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. For more info:  
Not just on TWC. The networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. More info:  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Not yet on Verizon Fios. The networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. More info:  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Should work, just tested it. Here's the direct link:  
The networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. For more info:  
Brown says he’s looking for execution on the offensive end w/ pace & protecting the paint on defense more than anything tonight. #LakersCamp 
Channel 403 for HD. 
Kobe was fine at today’s walk through, he’ll start. Mike Brown is looking to keep everyone’s mins around 20 for the 1st preseason contest. 
The networks are available to all carriers, not just TWC, negotiations are on-going. For more info:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
Rookie Robert Sacre will start at center for the Lakers tonight w/ Dwight Howard sidelined. #LakersCamp 
We get your frustration, negotiations are on-going & people are working to resolve it.Share your voice:  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers and people are working hard to resolve it. For more info:  
Not on DirecTV tonight. Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers to get the networks. For more info:  
Pau Gasol, Steve Blake & Steve Nash arriving in Fresno. #LakersCamp  
The networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. For more info:  
Pau Gasol, Steve Blake & Steve Nash arriving in Fresno. #LakersCamp  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers and people are working hard to resolve it. For more info:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers and people are working hard to resolve it. Make your voice heard:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers and people are working hard to resolve it. For more info:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers and people are working hard to resolve it. For more info:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers and people are working hard to resolve it. For more info:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers. Let your provider know t you want your Lakers this season:  
The networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. Make your voice heard:  
Negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard. Make your voice heard:  
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. 
Not just on Time Warner Cable. Networks are available to all carriers, negotiations are on-going. 
Panorama view of the team's setup in the Fresno State locker room. #LakersCamp  
Darius Johnson-Odom, Jodie Meeks, Greg Somogyi & Robert Sacre at the arena early.  
The Lakers logo on the floor in Fresno Save Mart Center  
yes it’ll be on at 7 with pregame programming starting at 5:30. 
sweet! 
much appreciated 
one of you looks ready… 
you’re correct. 7pm. 
No Dwight tonight. Everyone else should be available. #LakersCamp RT is dwight still ruled out for tonight's game? 
FILM BREAKDOWN:  Take a closer look at intricacies of the potential Nash/Howard pick & roll w/ Tom Bialaszewski. 
#LakersCamp RT Time for shootaround #Fresno  
unfair!! 
On & tonight. Visit  for more info. RT what channel is it on? 
awesome! 
we understand, negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to get it done. Make your voice heard:  
#LakersCamp RT Sunday nite football?...chillleeee please...Laker boys tonite!!! 
awesome! See you soon! 
negotiations are on-going w/ all carriers & people are working hard. Make your voice heard:  
403 
awesome 
always a tough one at games, but you never know. Good luck! 
awesome, see you there. 
we understand, negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to get it done. Make your voice heard:  
let your provider know directly that you want your Lakers this season. 
we understand, negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to get it done. Make your voice heard:  
we understand, negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to get it done. Make your voice heard:  
we understand, negotiations are on-going & people are working hard to get it done. Make your voice heard:  
lookin good 
sometimes thing are classic because they’re classic. 
The wait is almost over, just 12 hrs until the Lakers tip it off for the 1st time this season. Who's coming to Fresno? #LakersCamp 
see ya soon 
there ya go 
#LakersCamp RT Among the jobs of LAL's rookies: loading the bus after plane lands.  
check it on your desktop, the NBA is having issues with their mobile sites. 
Here's your Friday practice update from head coach Mike Brown:  #LakersCamp 
pretty solid 
Check out more pictures from Friday's morning session over on our facebook page:  
Mike Brown praising camp: “He’s shown that ‘hey I need to be on the floor.’” Brown noted Hill’s activity. #LakersCamp 
awesome 
Finishing up practice on the defensive end today. #LakersCamp  
not this year, sorry 
1st gm is 2 days away, Sunday night in Fresno vs. RT When will the first game of the Lakers preseason be? #LakersCamp 
They're on the court right now. Should be finishing up around 11:30. RT Do lakers have practice again today?? #LakersCamp 
head over to  
.@SteveNash looks on as Kobe rises for a shot over  
You can see Pau's sweet pass & slam in traffic from yesterday at the :43 second mark:  #LakersCamp 
VIDEO: 1-on-1 w/ -  Pau on Howard, Nash, lack of distractions, new offense & practice footage. #LakersCamp 
Kobe laces 'em back up to get extra shots up. #LakersCamp  
Head coach Mike Brown talks with his big men.  
VIDEO: on playing with in the post -  
VIDEO: Head coach Mike Brown details the team's progression after day three of #LakersCamp -  
PHOTO GALLERY: Thursday's practice in El Segundo -  
WATCH: talks about playing in the post w/ & recent comments made by -  #LakersCamp 
appreciate the feedback 
Kobe on how the new additions help him: “I have a lot more breathing room. Guys can’t put bodies on me all the time.” #LakersCamp 
How good of a passer is Mike Brown just said, “he’s Steve Nash in the paint.” Praised Pau’s versatility. #LakersCamp 
Brown on today: “He looked great. He looked a lot like the guy we had trouble guarding in the past.” #LakersCamp 
Brown also mentioned how great Blake was playing before his injury. Him & Duhon were both on the 2nd unit at the end of practice today. 
Head coach Mike Brown on return: “He’s tough as nails… you couldn’t tell this was his 1st practice.” #LakersCamp 
La voz de los Lakers is here at practice today. Check him out all season on  
.@DwightHoward throwing it down.  
Lakers running 5-on-5 at the end of practice today. Dwight running w/ the starters.  
#24  
nice 
Close up of #LakersCamp  
WATCH: Kobe Bryant talks about how the team is coming together & -  
.@DwightHoward still feeling good after his 2nd practice:  #LakersCamp 
appreciate it 
WATCH: on the league's new flopping policy & how team chemistry is coming along -  #LakersCamp 
WATCH: Head coach Mike Brown gives an update on the progression of the offense & defense -  #LakersCamp 
Full photo gallery from today's morning practice session:  #LakersCamp 
.@Jmeeks20 at today’s practice. #LakersCamp  
Dwight talking to the media after today's 1st session. #LakersCamp  
Panorama look at the team finishing up their 1st practice of the day. #LakersCamp  
we’ll get some shots of Jodie today. 
Nice tribute in the Lakers media room to longtime cameraman Artie Williams III, who passed away last month.  
awesome! 
well played 
Here’s another one:  RT I never get tired of the posting photos of the new team. Like Like Like! 
hi Tiana, here’s your tweet. 
Aguilar's wearing #23, we'll get it fixed up. 
CDR is wearing #9, Nelson #91, Somogyi #55 
check out  they've got you covered on both. 
Clean shaven Mamba after the Olympics Goatee. 
Had a 4 hour practice today, two practices tomorrow. RT are there 2-a-day practices yet ? 
Even more photos from today's practice over on our Facebook page:  #LakersCamp 
Great info in the caption on Chris Douglas-Roberts' instagram pic. Follow him on there: 'montecristo_ritchie'  
awesome 
only five more days until our first game. 
Last interview of the day, Kobe talks about his 17th first practice of his Lakers career -  #LakersCamp 
.@DwightHoward was on the court w/ his new teammates for the 1st time today. He talks about it here:  
WATCH: talks about the 1st day & integrating the new guys -  #LakersCamp 
Hear what had to say about his 1st practice in Los Angeles. WATCH:  #LakersCamp 
This is how the big men break it down at the end of practice. #Lakers  
Post practice Kobe stretch. #LakersCamp  
Last guy on the court shooting: Kobe Bryant #LakersCamp  
.@SteveNash nailed all 3 FTs to end practice so the video staff had to run instead of the team. #LakersCamp  
Coach Jordan going over the offense w/ & #LakersCamp  
Kobe at the tail end of the team's 4 hour session. #LakersCamp  
negotiations are on-going. Visit  for more info & to make your voice heard. 
see ya soon 
nope, no obstructed views at STAPLES Center. 
Sorry, practices are closed. RT where can i watch it? Anywhere on the web? Whats the address 
of course 
The Lakers first practice of the 2012-13 season starts in 15 minutes. #LakersCamp 
#TWCSportsLaunch Time Warner Cable Sportsnet / Time Warner Cable Deportes  
One last pic of the starting 5 to cap off Media Day 2012. #LakersCamp  
A lot of smiles from on his 1st day in Laker land. #LakersCamp  
Lakers legend & analyst jumps in a pic with the young guys. #LakersCamp  
Kobe talking with #LakersCamp  
OFFICIAL: Lakers sign forward Chris Douglas-Roberts. Press release -  
A look at your full Lakers 2012-13 coaching staff. #LakersCamp  
.@DwightHoward on live with #LakersCamp  
A lot of people want to talk to Dwight. #LakersCamp  
Metta on the green screen. #LakersCamp  
Serious business. #LakersCamp  
.@SteveNash meets Lakers play-by-play man Bill Macdonald for the 1st time. #LakersCamp  
Jamison. 4. #LakersCamp  
And your new look Lakers backcourt. & Kobe Bryant. #LakersCamp  
Kobe & catch up after a long offseason. #LakersCamp  
The new look Lakers front court. & #LakersCamp  
The new additions having some fun at media day. #LakersCamp  
Your new starting 5 together for the 1st time in the gold. What'd you think? #LakersCamp  
A panorama look at the media day setup.  
.@ESPNLA710 is airing live from media day. Check it out.  
The gym two hours before the start of media day Lakers Practice Court  
The '12-13 season officially begins today w/ media day 11am PT. Follow us & all day long.  #LakersCamp 
exactly 
No stream, but all the videos will be on the site RT Will  be streaming all things related to media day? 
Absolutely not. 12 hours until it all officially gets going. media day tomorrow ! Is it wrong to be this excited?? 
correct 
training camp starts tomorrow, first preseason game next Sunday. 
no live stream this year. Check for tweets during it & videos after. 
videos on the website afterwards 
no live stream this year. Check for tweets during it & videos after. 
Around 11am PT. Look for the tweets. RT Can you tell us what time Media Day starts? 
around 11 
sorry, no. 
11am PT 
See ya soon RT Somewhere over the California border..... 
Lakers legend & Studio Analyst Big Game James Worthy is now on twitter. Give him a follow at 
Media day starts at 11 tomorrow. No plans for a live stream but plenty of tweets & video afterwards. 
lookin good 
<---- and time for a new avatar for you 
Making the most of the final day off RT Beautiful day in Catalina Island  
Just one more day... 24 hours... 1,440 minutes... until #LakersCamp starts up  
We're getting closer... Just 2 days until #LakersCamp  
The new networks are being made available to all carriers. Negotiations are on-going. Visit  
Next Sunday, the 7th, in Fresno against the Warriors. 
Monday 
#OneHome Finale:  Take a look at some of the best moments from our & #OneHome campaign. 
Monday 
awesome picture! 
sorry, there are no plans for an open practice at the Galen Center this season. 
Only three more days to go until #LakersCamp  
they've been at the gym along with some guys from other NBA teams before training camps officially start. 
not yet 
Lookin good boys 
Highlights from Thursday morning's run at the facility:  
Equipment man Carlos Maples estimates that he’s got about 150 pairs of shoes waiting for Kobe. Here’s some.  
"Backstage: Lakers" Promo:  Sneak peek of the new weekly behind-the-scenes show on & #OneHome 
.@dariusmorris4 drives on during today’s action Lakers Practice Court  
4 more days to go... #LakersCamp  
it’s getting to be that time. 
Highlights from the run at the Lakers training facility Wednesday morning. WATCH:  feat. 
we’ll definitely get a sit down with Jodie in the upcoming weeks. 
Here's a more complete look at workout from this morning. WATCH:  You excited? #DH12LA 
Want to see more pictures of workout today? Click here for the full gallery:  
not this year unfortunately 
.@DwightHoward also did a couple things around the rim w/ assistant coach Darvin Ham today. VIDEO:  
.@DwightHoward is here at the facility going through treatment w/ head physical therapist Judy Seto  
.@0goudelock going through drills, getting better this morning Lakers Practice Court  
We're just 5 days away from #LakersCamp  
WATCH:  New Dawn. New Day. New Home. #OneHome 
see ya there! 
Watch it here:  RT I love that new commercial for #GoLakers gives me goosebumpssssss 
see ya soon! 
6 days until #LakersCamp  
"5 Minutes: Antawn Jamison" -  The new Laker sits down w/ to talk about the recent scrimmages. 
Blake will be prohibited from participating in any impact exercises for approximately three weeks.  
INJURY UPDATE: suffered a puncture wound to his foot after stepping on a spike strip in a parking lot.  
rookie Darius Johnson-Odom 
One week to go... #LakersCamp  
Before you get too deep into your football Saturday, here’s the reminder that we’re just 9 days away from #LakersCamp  
sweet man! 
Full photo gallery from yesterday's scrimmage is up on our facebook page:  | Recap:  
can't wait 
well played! 
awesome! Congratulations & see you soon. 
congratulations 
In case you forgot about our new 6th man (who’s averaged 19.5ppg throughout his career): Antawn Jamison.  
Bill Macdonald & Stu Lantz will be behind the mics again this season, but all games, home & away will air on 
Lakers single game tickets go on sale to the general public this morning at 10am PT. Get yours here:  
getting to be that time of year! 
After practice canned a half court shot... from the bench... sitting down. -  Check it out. 
see you there! 
Had a little East Bay Funk out at practice today courtesy of (rookie Darius Johnson-Odom)  
Welcome home Endeavour! RT A great day to live in Los Angeles! Welcome Endeavour! #spottheshuttle  
Antawn Jamison sitting down w/ for a LakersTV interview. Lakers Practice Court  
Video to come. RT On his 2nd shot, nailed a halfcourt shot sitting down in a chair. Video later. 
Antwan Jamison, & working out this morning.  
10 days until training camp opens. #LakersCamp  
awesome! 
we're good. Just ready for training camp to get started. 
A great #TBT RT Me & James Worthy after a practice in 1989:  
the games will now be seen on & 
yup, check out  
Training camp opens October 1st. First preseason game is October 7th in Fresno. RT when does preseason start? 
awesome! See you soon. 
thanks! 
"One word that means Lakers? Familia... the Lakers are LA." -  Meet Studio Anchor #OneHome 
The new networks are being made available to all carriers. Visit  to make your voice heard. 
that's pretty awesome! #GoLakers 
negotiations are on-going. Visit  to make your voice heard. 
11 days until training camp starts #LakersCamp RT Man I'm in LA y'all...feeling too good!!!... 
we can't either! #GoLakers 
priorities firmly in the right place! 
good stuff! 
KCAL was a great partner of ours for 30 years, but going forward our games, home & away, will be on & 
thanks! 
We're 12 days away from Media Day & our #12 & #10 are excited. ICYMI: & "One Voice" -  
that's a good look 
You know him as now meet Mike Trudell as your full-time sideline reporter on  #OneHome 
looks great! 
sweet!! 
awesome!! 
October 1st 
Meet analyst & reporter for -  #OneHome  
If you're a college student w/ technical web skills, we're looking for an intern. Come work with us:  
Media Day is just 14 days away. RT when does camp open up for the lakers? 
"The Lakers are our pride & joy." LA native & new Studio Host on LAL & the city. WATCH:  #OneHome 
OFFICIAL: Lakers sign guard  Johnson-Odom was the 55th pick in the 2012 NBA Draft 
Watch and speak with one voice on joining the  by #OneHome 
Lakers legend "Big Game" James Worthy is excited to be a part of the team. Here's why:  #OneHome 
.@TWCSportsNet announces James Worthy, & as on-air talent:  #OneHome 
It's Select-A-Seat day for the new season ticket holders coming off the wait list. STAPLES Center  
Meet the 2012-13  
sweet! 
thanks 
awesome! See ya soon. 
impressive 
Check  Tix on sale Sept 22nd. RT Is the schedule out already? When do tickets go on sale? 
Media Day is Oct. 1st. Preseason begins Oct. 7th. RT when does the season start officially? I just can't wait already. 
check out League Pass International from  as the season approaches. Works pretty good. 
Get a sneak peak at what the Lakers will look like on -  #OneHome  
awesome! 
our first preseason game is October 7th. Opening night of the regular season is October 30th vs. Dallas. 
no plans for throwback unis this season. Sorry. 
visit  for more info 
Unfortunately Kobe doesn't have a twitter account. Here's all the official accounts:  
23 days until training camp starts. RT Heeeyyy worrrlllddd 
we can't wait to see that jersey flying up and down the court. 29 days until our 1st preseason game. 
we're getting closer.... 
Check out all the pics from Jamaal Wilkes' #HoopHall enshrinement ceremony on our facebook page:  
luckily it was only a dream. #LAallday 
Never too early! RT I know it may be early for this, but GO  
Jamaal gives his #HoopHall induction speech.  #HOF12 
Sacre has been assigned #50 
All of that is already in the works my man:  
OFFICIAL: The Lakers sign second round draft pick Robert Sacre -  
Congratulations Silk! Naismith Hall of Fame Class of 2012  
Official. RT The Lakers just announced that they hired Eddie Jordan, Steve Clifford and Bernie Bickerstaff as assistants. 
unfortunately we don't have a mascot 
You know it!! Our Instagram username is: lakers RT you guys have an instagram? 
Jamaal "Silk" Wilkes joins the class of 2012 tonight. Watch it live on at 4:30pm PT.  
One month until our first preseason game RT Cant wait for season to start!!!!! 
you can always order League Pass International like in the past. 
We are committed to reaching as many fans as possible, not just those w/ TWC. Our FAQ's explain more:  
Negotiations are underway. You can let them know you want them to carry the Lakers by going to  
Talks are underway with Charter. You can let them know you want the Lakers by going to  
Channel numbers will be announced closer to the launch on October 1st. Stay tuned to  for updates. 
See if your TV provider has and and watch some of their behind the scenes content:  #OneHome 
sweet 
appreciate the support from the other side of the date line. Go Lakers! 
OFFICIAL: The Lakers have signed rookie center Greg Somogyi and rookie forward Reeves Nelson.  
It's a good look. Who else has one? #DH12LA RT Just got my jersey!!!  
not bad! 
Want to win tickets to Opening Night & see the Lakers kick off their new era? Enter to win here:  #OneHome 
The Lakers past & present in the middle. RT Me and together. For many years to come.  
The with and put on the Lakercitos basketball clinic in Pacoima. Watch:  #OneHome 
Shop for FREE shipping for domestic orders & new Power Deals on #LAKERS gear this Labor Day Weekend:  
The will honor Jamaal Wilkes and this season. Get dates and details:  
Last day to enter to go behind the scenes at Lakers Media Day with  #OneHome CA Residents only. 
Lakers Spanish analyst Francisco Pinto joins to talk hoops & the new  #OneHome 
83 degrees & sunny in LA today Jodie. See ya soon!! RT First time I've seen this much rain in ATL in years! 
Single Game tickets go on sale September 22nd RT when are you guys putting up the link for single game tickets? 
we love you too! 
Our Top 10 countdown of 2011-12 concludes with moment #1, the Game 7 playoff win vs. DEN:  #OneHome 
Kobe has never been on twitter 
It's been exactly 2 wks since officially became a Laker. Here's 25 pics from his 1st day on the job:  
in the Dwight Howard trade along with Earl Clark as well. 
New PG Chris Duhon joins to talk about his new role with the Lakers:  #OneHome 
How do you think you’d do against in ping pong? His reach is pretty formidable. Lakers HQ  
Our new TV partners over & are gearing up for launch. Check out the facilities:  #OneHome 
Happy 34th b-day to #24 Kobe Bryant!! NBATV will be airing some of Kobe’s classic games starting at 9am PT.  
Marge Hearn talks about her husband and legendary Lakers announcer Chick Hearn. Watch:  #OneHome 
welcome to the club 
Go behind-the-scenes of the scouting department w/ the youngest member of LA's 1st family of hoops, Jesse Buss:  
right on! 
our pleasure 
nice! 
 has you covered right here:  
just click the link in the tweet to download it 
looks twice as nice 
sweet 
already in the works 
we'll work on a retina display version for the iPad 
there it is! 
well done 
there ya go! 
looks good! 
nice! 
That's a good look! Who else has it up already? RT New wallpaper and phone background.  
You can also download the printable schedule here:  (.pdf) or import it to your Outlook/iCal here:  
#OneHome Keep the Lakers starting 5 on your desktop w/ our new schedule wallpaper. DOWNLOAD:  |  
Top Moment #2 of 2011-12: Kobe goes for 40+ in 4 straight games -  #OneHome 
Get them here:  
us too 
Our #3 moment from 2011-12 shines it's spotlight on 30 rebounds in a single game. Check it out:  #OneHome 
at Dwight's introductory press conference 
"We're hopeful that 10 years from now..." #DH12LA Lakers HQ  
Have you seen the & billboards that are up all over LA? Send us a pic.  #OneHome 
TOP 10 COUNTDOWN: #4 - "Clutch 3s Deliver Playoff Win"  #OneHome 
Our Top 10 countdown of last season continues w/ moment 5: Double-OT win over the Thunder -  #OneHome 
Welcome back Devin! RT Officially signed my contract today!!! Back in Purple & Gold #Lakeshow 
OFFICIAL: The Lakers have signed & re-signed Press release:  
Another gold medal for Kobe.  
Congratulations to Kobe & for bringing home the gold medal & to the silver.  
It's time for Pau + Espana vs. Kobe + Team USA. Who's coming home with the gold?  
Lakers flag on stage. RT The Red Hot #monarchyofroses STAPLES Center  
RHCP showing love tonight. RT Josh from walked out wearing #12 jersey! #LAKERS 
awesome. Got to get a Howard/Nash duo to go with those. 
gotta start 'em young 
The cover of today’s LA Times sports section featuring & the Lakers legendary big men. #DH12LA  
ICYMI: press conference with the Lakers:  #DH12LA 
Howard. 12. #DH12LA  
1st look at wearing the gold armor. What'd you guys think? #DH12LA  
#DH12LA RT Welcome to #Lakers, Dwight. #Lakers fans let's make him feel at home.  
#DH12LA, the trophies & the media  
#LakersDay - #DH12LA 
If the stream's not working for you, try this link -  
"I'm happy to be a Laker. I'm so excited it's hard to talk." - #DH12LA 
#DH12LA RT Dwight Howard holding #12 jersey  
Dwight Howard heading to the stage now, watch it live here:  #DH12LA 
refresh the page 
Lakers executives & Jim Buss await arrival. #DH12LA  
A panoramic look at the press conference scene at Lakers HQ. #DH12LA  
yup 
you're +9 hours from LA, so 2am 
yes today 
should be 
today, in an hour 
in an hour 
on  
.@DwightHoward will be introduced for the 1st time as a Laker at 5pm PT. We'll be streaming it live on  #DH12LA 
#DH12LA RT .@dwighthoward follows in the tradition of great big men - Mikan, Chamberlain & 
#DH12LA RT Dr jerry buss thanks you being the greatest owner in professional basketball history. Lifting up the city. My man. 
Welcome to Los Angeles  #DH12LA 
OFFICIAL: The have acquired 3-time Defensive POY & 5-time All-NBA 1st team center Dwight Howard. Release:  
Team Spain and playing now vs. Russia and Team USA and Kobe play today at 12pt vs. Argentina. 
MWP, Stu Lantz, Francisco Pinto and visited the Lakercitos basketball clinic. Postcards:  
In Part 2 of our Q&A with the Lakers physical therapist, Dr. Judy Seto talks about treating Kobe. Part 2:  
Go behind the scenes at Lakers Media Day from and Enter here:  #OneHome CA residents only 
Lakers head physical therapist, Dr. Judy Seto keeps the team on the floor. Understand her role in our Q&A. Part 1:  
Kobe rattled home a late game 3 pointer in our #6 moment from 11-12, Kobe vs. Nets:  #OneHome 
Andrew Bynum upped his game and stayed healthy on the way to his first All-Star appearance. #7 from 11-12:  #OneHome 
We continue our Top 10 2011-12 moments with an triple-double at GSW:  #OneHome 
Kobe and Team USA start in 15 min. RT Post on & Spain's narrow victory over Britain:  
Hall of Fame guard Gail Goodrich talks about the 71-72 Lakers, the 33 game win streak and playing as a team:  #OneHome 
Kobe showed his full array in a vintage performance in our #9 moment from 2011-12: Kobe’s 48 vs. Suns:  #OneHome 
Metta and Pau talk about being Lakers. MWP:  
Pau en Espanol:  #OneHome 
LAL operated out of a Princeton set in Vegas in part to test it out, as it's being considered for the senior squad in the fall. 
Last day to enter to win a VIP trip to see the Lakers in Las Vegas. Enter here:  #OneHome CA and NV residents only. 
With an eye on 12-13, we look back on our Top 10 from 2011-12 starting with #10: Sessions vs. Mavericks:  #OneHome 
.@TWCSportsNet and documented the entire five-day auditions for a series that will air following production #OneHome 
Photos from the final round of Laker Girls auditions:  
All the fun facts about the Lakers 2012-13 schedule, presented by  View the schedule:  
Prospective are now dancing individually in front of one another.  
Veteran of the Dara fields questions from the judges.  
Which game are you most interested in? Lakers 2012-13 schedule:  
The hopefuls getting ready in between routines.  
Three prospective awaiting judgment...  
Here are your 34 finalists, now competing to make the squad.  
Some key dates for our 2012-13 Lakers schedule: Dec. 7 OKC; Dec. 25 vs. NYK; Jan 17 vs. MIA; Feb 7 at BOS; Apr 7 at LAC. 
Here's the Antawn Jamison press conference video. Part 1:  Part 2:  
The Lakers have re-signed Jordan Hill, who in 12 postseason games averaged 4.8 points & 6.3 rebounds in 18.1 minutes. 
Physically, Jamison said he feels better now than he did as a young player; credits yoga and knowing how to prepare his body in offseason. 
Antawn Jamison on playing with a team with championship potential: "I just wanted a chance." 
Click here to watch the live stream of Antawn Jamison's press conference:  
Jamison: "It's gratifying to be with such great talent. It's going to be a great fit." 
Here's the official press release for LAL's signing veteran forward Antawn Jamison:  
TV Commentators Stu Lantz and Francisco Pinto on what fans will get from and  #OneHome 
Remembering the legendary Chick Hearn:  #OneHome What are your Chick memories? 
1 of 2 FT's from have him up to 12 points for Spain, but USA now leads 69-49. Kobe has 4P, 3A, 2R. 
Shop Online Summer Sale! 50% OFF + 75% OFF select Lakers gear! Use code SUMMER50  
Story time. Lakers legend Jerry West talks about the magical 33-gm win streak & title in 1971-72:  #OneHome 
The hopefuls getting loose for the next dance.  
Some of the hopefuls waiting to hear their # called for 2nd cut.  
An early report from auditions:  
A rookie last year, dancer Teresa here moving to a Pitbull song.  
The returning just ahead of the first routine to learn.  
Returning dancer Brittney is back at auditions.  
Resume dropping for prospective at the team's practice facility.  
They're lined up around the block at auditions.  
Send us pics of you wearing your #OneHome shirt & we'll RT some of the best. 
Thanks to everyone that joined us today & got a #OneHome shirt courtesy of & We'll be doing more soon. #OneHome 
We’re setup at the plaza until 5pm. Come down & get your “One Home One Goal” shirt. #OneHome  
just two today, we’ll be doing more down the road. 
2nd tshirt stop of the day will be at plaza at 4pm. Head down to see the & take home one of these:  
We’ll have a 2nd downtown location today announced around 3pm 
We're all set up & ready to giveaway some #OneHome shirts. Who's joining the at 3825 Crenshaw Blvd.?  
yup 
1st stop is at 3825 Crenshaw Blvd. LA, CA today at 11am. Come down, get a shirt & meet the #OneHome  
We'll be giving away these #OneHome shirts around LA tomorrow. More details in the morning.  
Win a VIP trip to see the Lakers play in Las Vegas from Enter here:  #OneHome CA and NV residents only. 
The Lakers finish up their slate tonight against the at 5:30pm PT. Tune in on 
Bill Macdonald & talk about the exciting opportunities for the Lakers on their new #OneHome,  
gonna be fun 
Us too. #OneHome RT This has me hype! Everything #Lakers on one channel all day every day Ü #OneHome  
.@dariusmorris4 shoots a perfect 9/9 for 24pts but it's not enough as the Lakers rally falls short & they lose to the Spurs 92-81. 
Eyenga's and-1 closes the 3rd quarter with the Lakers trailing 71-62. Christian's got 9pts & 4rebs so far today. 
Lakers trail 19-18 after 1. Much better effort today. RT The Exec VP Jim Buss is joining at the start of 2nd Qtr. 
The Lakers team has tipped off against the Spurs. Catch it live on NBATV. 
Lakers coverage is going to a whole new level. on the new Lakers TV networks:  #onehome 
Not a good result tonight, but 2nd round pick Robert Sacre joins us to talk about his experience so far in Vegas:  
.@christeyenga8 & finish in double figures but the Lakers fall to the Heat 106-56 at the 
Darius Morris has 11pts to go along with 4 rebs & 3 asts but the Lakers trail Miami 78-43 after three quarters. 
Lakers struggle from the field in the 1st quarter against the Heat, shooting just 25% on their way to a 33-11 deficit. 
appreciate that! 
Starters tonight for the Lakers: Chinemelu Elonu, Toure’ Murry, Robert Sacre, & 
The Lakers team is out on the floor for warmups. They take on the Heat on NBATV in just a few.  
it's already out, check  
The Lakers fall to 84-72 in their 2nd game at the They'll have tomorrow off & return to action Monday. 
Eyenga's shot won't go before the buzzer sounds & the Lakers trail 62-57 heading into the final quarter. 
Lakers trail 15-12 after the 1st quarter against the Kings. Chinemelu Elonu picks up 4 fouls but also leads all scorers w/ 6pts. 
Catch tonight's game live on NBATV or stream it on   
Elonu & Majok warming up. Tip off coming right up.  
The Lakers team is back in action at 5pm PT vs. the Kings. Check it out on NBATV or streaming on  
WATCH: Darius Johnson-Odom (@KingMe_DJ1) talks about his first game as a Laker -  
The Lakers drop their 1st game to the 91-50. led the team w/ 14pts. added 11/4/4. 
Summer League only. On the senior squad he wears #88. 
Lakers shoot just 4/15 in the 1st q as they dig a 24-12 hole for themselves. comes off the bench to lead w/ 6pts. 
Catch the game live on NBATV or subscribe to the broadband channel for $5 here:  
Starting for the Lakers tonight: Chinemelu Elonu, , Robert Sacre & Eric Griffin. 
Draft pick Robert Sacre warming up before the team's first summer league game.  
Even the team's Summer League hotel is Laker'd out.  
"Gents, I wear my uniform where ever I go!!" - // Watch it here in "Nash Behind-the-Scenes" -  
Summer league starts tomorrow for the Lakers in Vegas. RT me and in try O2  
WATCH: Go behind-the-scenes of 1st day in Lakerland as he meets the staff & takes some pics -  
ICYMI: Here's yesterday's press conference. Part I -  | Part II -  
'@SteveNash did a ton of interviews yesterday, but this is the only one he did w/ so check out:  
Photo gallery of today's eventful day in El Segundo w/ through the lens of team photographer Andy Bernstein:  
Give us your best caption for this one.  
 has everything you need. RT when can we get Steve Nash jerseys?? 
Nash hangin' on Nash. #WelcomeToLA  
First look at wearing the home gold. What'd you think?  
* talking with Mike Brown & Mitch Kupchak up in the basketball ops offices.  
* meeting for the first time.  
Steve Nash sitting down to chat with  
Thanks for joining us for the press conference. We'll have the full video up later today. Who's excited about having Steve in LA? 
Nash on why jersey #10. "I'm a huge soccer fan. My 1st word was goal. #10 is the number of play makers in soccer. It's as simple as that." 
Nash: "My back feels great. I feel really well. I can't complain." 
Nash: "I'm a jerk... j/k. I think everyone knows I'm a pretty positive leader, pretty encouraging." Watch live:  
Want to be the first one of your friends to wear a gold #10 Nash jersey? Order here now:  
Steve Nash is headed to the podium for his 1st press conference as a Laker. Watch it live here:  #fb 
Here's entering the LAL practice facility.  
We'll be streaming the 12pm PT presser live on the website. Here's the link if you want to get in early:  
ICYMI: talks about what it means to have in P&G w/ head coach Mike Brown:  
Which of these #10 jerseys are you going to pick up first?  
OFFICIAL: Lakers acquire 2-time MVP RELEASE:  Welcome Steve to LA w/ a RT!!  
Which of these Kobe's gives the USA the best chance for Gold at London 2012?  
"Dr. Buss is in a local hospital where he is being treated for dehydration. He is recovering & is expected to be released soon.” 
RELEASE: Lakers Statement Regarding Reports About Dr. Jerry Buss -  
Check out the full photo gallery of Kobe with over the weekend in Las Vegas:  
Kobe poses for a portrait on the 1st day of Team USA practice in Las Vegas.  
OFFICIAL: Guard Darius Morris signed his qualifying offer today. Press Release -  
The Lakers have officially extended qualifying offers to & -  
Direct link to conference call:  "Thanks fellas, LAKE SHOW!" is at the end of this. 
Sacre talked about how he took over former Laker & Zag Turiaf's role as the energy guy at Gonzaga & remains friends with Ronny. 
Sacre on his role: "I think it's going to be very similar to Ronny Turiaf's role...shut my mouth, know my role & help Kobe get another ring" 
Sacre on his game: "Defense wins championships. Offensive wins games & defense wins championships. I take a lot of pride in my defense." 
Sacre on being drafted 60th: "I was thinking best for last. I was selected to go to one of the best teams in NBA history." 
Robert Sacre starts his conference call with a big "HELLO LA" 
Darius Johnson-Odom signs off his conference call "Thanks fellas. LAKE SHOW!" 
More Johnson-Odom: "I want to be that guy that has that spark off the bench. Brings energy on the defensive end. Knock down open shots." 
Darius: "I was quite happy. To be able to play with a great team that knows each other. It's going to be a learning process." 
Welcome Darius to the Lakers with a follow. RT Laker nation I will not disappoint 
Mitch on his exit interview w/ Kobe: “A relaxing breakfast. There was no agenda. It was really just a sit down & reacquaint.” 
Kupchak indicates the team had somewhere between 30-40 on their board. Selected him with the 55th pick. 
Kupchak on “If you go to summer league or watch on NBATV, you’ll like this kid. Ridiculously athletic. Fun to watch.” 
GM Mitch Kupchak talking about the #NBADraft Lakers Media Room  
OFFICIAL: The Lakers acquire the rights to #55 pick G Darius Johnson-Odom (@KingMe_DJ1) from the Mavs for cash considerations. 
The Lakers close out the 2012 #NBADraft by selecting Robert Sacre, a 7ft Center out of Gonzaga. 
After 4.5 hours, the Lakers are officially on the clock. #NBADraft 
Pick #40 in the books. The 60th selection is right around the corner. 
The schedule is usually released in early August. 
The #NBADraft is tonight! Coverage starts at 4:00pm PT on ESPN. 
Here's some background on the 60th pick, where the Lakers will be selecting in tomorrow night's #NBADraft:  
The NBA Draft is coming up Thursday. Here’s a 17-year old Andrew Bynum after the Lakers drafted him in 2005.  
New Story on  "NBA Draft … Coming Soon" -  
Kobe Bryant has most popular NBA jersey internationally. Details here:  
The first annual NBA SOCIAL MEDIA AWARDS air tonight on at 6pm PT. Join the conversation using #NBASMA. 
Full update by on what GM Mitch Kupchak had to say about Ramon Sessions' contract situation:  
RELEASE: Mike Brown Statement Regarding Ettore Messina -  
congratulations! 
Happy Father's Day! 
Get your Lakers loving dad the BEST gifts this Father’s Day! Check out  for more gift ideas!  
the schedule usually comes out sometime in early August. 
Tinseltown? #TITLETOWN 2009-2012 #Lakers #LAGalaxy #LAKings #THISISLA congrats  
GM Mitch Kupchak chats with from pre-draft camp in Chicago:  
The Lakers 2011-12 Season: By the Numbers -  
The Lakers practice court is doubling as a media area for the #STANLEYCUP Finals run this morning.  
OFFICIAL: The Lakers have exercised a team option on Andrew Bynum’s contract for the 2012-13 season -  
OFFICIAL: John Ireland (@LAIreland) & Mychal Thompson will be back on the radio broadcasts next season -  
The Lakers were saddened to learn of the loss of LeRoy Ellis over the weekend at the age of 72.  
Throwing Down. #RIPOrlando  
Former Laker Orlando Woolridge, who played with the team from 1988-90, passed away yesterday at the age of 52. -  
OFFICIAL: The Lakers have promoted Glenn Carraro to Assistant General Manager -  
The NBA wants to see your #Hoops. Here's one of ours at the team's training facility.   
yup, the TeamLA store at STAPLES Center should be open for normal business hours. 
Just posted a photo  
Congratulations also to Andrew Bynum who was named to the All-NBA team for the first time, garnering 2nd team honors. 
Kobe Bryant has been named to the All-NBA first team for the 7th straight season & 10th time overall. Congratulations Kobe!! 
here's everything you need to know about the transition to Time Warner:  
Mitch Kupchak talks about the 11-12 season & what lies ahead this offseason. Full recap & video here:  
That concludes our live streams from exit interviews. Thanks for everyone that watched the stream and followed along. 
Kupchak: "If I weren't here, Dr. Buss would probably get 50 phone calls from past & future GMs. Because this is the best job in the world." 
Mitch Kupchak indicates that the Lakers will pick up the option on Andrew Bynum's contract for next season. 
Our final exit interview of the day - Lakers GM Mitch Kupchak:  #fb 
Kobe is having his meeting with Mitch later in the week 
Matt Barnes just wrapped up his media session. Mitch Kupchak will be down in a few minutes to conclude today's exit interviews. 
It's podium time for -  #fb 
not today 
Here's the full video of media session following his 2011-12 exit interview:  
fixed 
fixed 
fixed 
fixed 
fixed 
Mike Brown now on the live stream:  #fb 
Mike Brown is coming up momentarily:  
Now on the live stream: -  #fb 
Steve Blake is up next and will be ready to go momentarily if you want to stick with the live stream:  
Pau:  
Pau Gasol is done meeting with Mitch Kupchak & Mike Brown, he's talking with the media live here:  #fb 
he's still meeting with Mitch and Mike 
still meeting with Mitch & Mike 
Here's the full 18 minutes of Andrew Bynum's exit interview for your viewing pleasure:  
awesome, thanks for following 
media's gotta eat too 
he's doing his later in the week 
you're not, still a lot of true fans in the mix 
He's supposed to meet with Mitch & Mike at 1pm, he'll be down after that 
He's supposed to meet with Mitch & Mike at 1pm, he'll be down after that 
lunch break 
it's uploading now, these things aren't instantaneous 
probably around 2:30-3pm today 
Now at the podium we've got to talk about his rookie season. Watch it live here:  #fb 
we've got them all day. Darius Morris coming up next followed by Pau Gasol. 
yup, later this afternoon 
Josh McRoberts is up next, tune in live now -  
says he's growing it out 
you want the Lakers to talk Spurs? You can check them out at 
10:30 is when he was expected to show up at the facility. Spent extra time hanging w/Mitch & MIke. 
refresh the page 
If you can't watch the live stream, follow for more details on all the exit interviews. 
Andrew Bynum is here & ready to go, click here to watch the live stream on  -  #fb 
Should start pretty soon, Andrew Bynum is still up meeting w/ Mitch & Mike. RT what time are the exit interviews today? 
 or go to  
Exit Interviews continue today w/ Andrew Bynum up first at approximately 10:30. We'll tweet the link to watch live when he sits down. 
dim the lights. 
I mean if you can, why not? And we support our STAPLES Center neighbors on the ice. 
Congrats to the on advancing to the #STANLEYCUP finals!! These guys are looking for a new neighbor. #GoKingsGo  
New photo gallery over on our Facebook page from today's Exit Interviews:  
Here's a closer look at what Ramon Sessions had to say at his exit interview today:  
Devin Ebanks on the 2011-12 season & his plans for the summer -  
Jordan Hill talks about his brief stint w/ the Lakers & what the future holds:  
Full recap & video of exit interview. It's entertaining.  
That concludes today's exit interview session. We'll be back tomorrow around 10:30am with Andrew Bynum. See ya then. 
Devin Ebanks is here to talk about his 2011-12 season & finish up today's exit interviews:  
just having fun. Jim Hill is at everything and we missed him today. 
we would expect nothing less. Thanks for the support. 
actually we're doing exit interviews right now. Golf later. 
only streaming on  
Pau's going tomorrow. We've got Ebanks and then that's it for the day. 
Devin Ebanks will be in next and that'll finish up today's exit interview session. 
Jordan Hill's turn at the mic:  
it'll be up on  in a little bit 
Ramon Sessions live now on   
Ramon 
nice 
click the link 
Troy Murphy's ready to go -  
Troy Murphy is up next in a little bit. We'll let you know when he sits down. 
sometime later today 
NBA streaming player is flash based, doesn't work on iPhones 
we'll miss you 
Use this:  RT link to stream is not working 
Follow for instant breakdowns as each guy meets with the media. 
Metta in front of the mics (watch it live here:   
Metta World Peace is live on  now:  #fb 
Today we'll have Metta followed by Troy Murphy, Ramon Sessions, Jordan Hill, Devin Ebanks & Christian Eyenga. Everyone else tomorrow. 
We'll be streaming today's exit interviews live. is up 1st in a little bit. Watch here:  
Kobe: "Come hell or high water we're gonna be there again. It's just something about the Lakers' organization."  
Getting off the plane for the final time this season.  
Every year we ask you fans to buy the ticket, take the ride. This ride ended too early. We'll regroup & be back even stronger next season. 
Lakers fall in Game 5 to the Oklahoma City Thunder 106-90 & are eliminated from the playoffs 4-1. Thanks for following along all year. 
Hey Kobe V of the night pushes his total to 38, but it's still a double-digit hole at 97-84. 6:33 left. 
Thunder open the 4th on a 10-0 run to make it 93-77 with 9:25 left in Game 5. 
awesome 
Gasol's putback isn't in time. Lakers have an 83-77 deficit to overcome in the 4th quarter if they're to keep their season alive. #GoLakers 
nope, but it's rolls off the fingers as easily as it does the tongue. 
MWP for 3! 
you're welcome 
Fine, we've got enough pro votes to officially make that fast break dunk Hey Kobe IV RT Kobe IV 
Kobe's 4th dunk of the night wasn't quite Hey Kobe, but still still a good one. 30pts on 13/21 shooting. LA up 68-66. #GoLakers 
Yup RT Hey Kobe III? 
Hopefully 16 minutes at the half gave you enough time to vent, let's focus on the 2nd half now. Lakers down 54-51. #GoLakers 
Mike Brown talked about that at shootaround today. Said the Lakers will just have to match it if they're not going to call it. 
Pau Gasol responds to the criticism of the past couple days w/ a 10pt, 9reb first half. LA shooting 49% to OKC's 39%, but losing rebs 29-23. 
Halftime OKC 54, Lakers 51. LA wins the 3rd quarter 30-28 despite the FT shooting contest by the Thunder at the end of the half. 
like the team, we're leaving it all on the court (as it were) 
Hey Kobe II 
Hey Kobe 
sorry about that, we're slightly ahead of the TV broadcast as well. 
4 straight points by has the Lakers within a point at 46-45 as 4 minutes remain in the 2nd. 
Fisher's shooting 8/24 this series 
give out shirts the first game of every playoff series and multiple times during the regular season. 
Ebanks getting the nod over Barnes tonight. 
we're watching it 
More Bynum, splitting the double & getting the layin and the harm. He'll head to the line with the Lakers up 34-32. 8:17 left in the half. 
Lakers taking it into the paint early in the 2nd. Buckets by Bynum (2), Gasol & Sessions have all come at the rim. Tied up at 32. 
Lakers in foul trouble after the 1st quarter: Jordan HIll 3 fouls, Kobe Bryant & Andrew Bynum with 2 fouls each. 
End of the 1st: OKC 26, Lakers 21. Kobe goes for 15 points, but the rest of the squad shoots just 2/12 & lose the battle of the boards. 
Jordan HIll grabs the Lakers 1st offensive board of the game & puts it back to make it 25-21. Thunder have 7 already (19-10 total rebs). 
Ebanks comes in for his first action, joining Blake, Bryant, HIll & Gasol as Derek Fisher heads to the line. 
Kobe toss it in left handed as the shot clock ticks down. Bryant finding his shot early, 15pts on 6/8. Lakers down 21-19. 
Lakers make their 1st FT of the night on the tech by Westbrook after starting 0/3 from the line. LA leads 9-6 with 7:09 left in the 1st. 
The scene inside the arena in OKC. Tip coming up on TNT & 710ESPN  
wear it! #GoLakers 
2 hours #GoLakers 
PHOTO:  RT Before the team left, was helping prop up for hammer dunks. 
they watch film pretty much everyday. 
Mike Brown on the Lakers chances of winning tonight: "I'm confident. Obviously we're here to win." #GoLakers 
With no practice before the flight, The Lakers watched film & walked through some things at the team hotel last night after arriving in OKC. 
The basic theme of media session: "No excuses"  
Shootaround Chesapeake Energy Arena  
With the Thunder leading 3-1, it's win or go home time for the purple & gold tonight in OKC. 6:30pm PT tip on TNT & 710ESPN. #GoLakers 
Kobe getting off the bus at the team hotel #GoLakers  
We're back in OKC -  
Cool Kobe/Worthy mural. (photo by  
Pau Gasol talks about the final minute of Game 4:  
Andrew Bynum on how the Thunder denied the bigs the ball down the stretch:  
The Lakers can't sustain the effort down the stretch & drop Game 4 to OKC 103-100. Thunder lead the series 3-1. Game 5 Monday in OKC. 
Durant steps up & nails a 3 after consecutive turnovers to give OKC a 101-98 lead. 13.7 left, Lakers ball. 
Kobe knocks down both to tie it back up at 98 all. 1:04 to play in Game 4. #GoLakers 
Durant misses both, but the Thunder have cut the Lakers lead to just 96-94 with 2:33 remaining. #GoLakers 
89-78 LA RT What a 4-min stretch from MWP. He's everywhere, draining another 3 (14 pts, 7 in 4th) then tying Ibaka up on D. 
MWP for 3!!!! 
MWP for 3!!! 
It's good 
The clinic continues: Kobe up to 31pts (10/18 FG, 11/14 FT) on an array of offensive moves. Lakers up 80-71 after 3 quarters. #GoLakers 
much love back 
Gasol's putback makes him the 4th Laker in double-digits tonight at 10pts. Lakers up 74-62 with 3:49 left in the 3rd. 
how's your buddy liking the game though? 
Halfway through the 3rd & the teams have played to a 12-12 draw. 8 more points for Kobe this qtr to give him 24 total. 68-58 LA. #GoLakers 
Halftime: Lakers 56, Thunder 46. Bynum doing it from all over the floor, 14pts, 7 rebs 4asts. Kobe adds 16. Rebs 24-14 LA. 
aww 
MWP for 3!! 
36-26 Lakers after the Blake triple & Bynum slam. OKC timeout. STAPLES rocking! RT BLAK3 
Lakers finish the quarter on a 13-6 run to take a 29-24 lead after 12 minutes. Kobe Bryant & Andrew Bynum 10pts each. LA shoots 60%. 
definitely can't hear him... feel free to let him know that. 
MWP for 3! 
Bynum's 1st two FGs come on dishes from Ramon, the big man returns the favor to a cutting Sessions for his 1st pts of the night. 12 all. 
After going 18/18 last game, Kobe's 1st points of the night come on 2 freebies from the line after the Sefolosha foul. 
Anthem's finished up. Lakers being intro'd. Time to protect home court. #GoLakers #BeTheDifference  
Pregame huddle.  
well played 
Yes, playing back-to-back games in the playoffs is unusual, but we're going with Kobe on this one.  
perfect 
If you're not into watching other playoff games, "Kobe: Doin' Work" is airing on ESPN Classic right now (DirecTV Ch. #614). #GoLakers 
it's true. The rare playoff back-to-back. 
he looks tired 
STAPLES Center handles double-headers all the time, nothing unusual about today. 
keyword: *franchise* record 
no 
you were 
he's a boss 
haha, didn't even notice that. Pretty awesome. 
Our 12,000th tweet goes out to a couple of our favorite Laker greats that wore #12 - Pat Riley & Vlade Divac. #GoLakers  
strange schedule because of the truncated season. Thunder have to play the same schedule. We'll be ready. 
download the NBA Gametime app for iPhone, it's got audio built in. 
strange schedule because of the truncated season. Thunder have to play the same schedule. We'll be ready. 
c'mon, she looks perfectly calm.... 
Here's what Kobe & Pau had to say in the interview room following last night's win, check it out:  #GoLakers 
that's the plan 
Here are some postgame numbers from the 99-96 Game 3 win compiled by  
boom! 
we're gonna go ahead and ignore that advice. 
posted at 9:30am, tips at 7:30pm. Don't need a calculator to figure that one out. 
glad we could help 
#ProtectHomeCourt Game 4 is 10 hours from now at STAPLES Center. #GoLakers  
Speaking Victory:  
Kobe's 18/18 set a franchise record for FTs in a playoff game, breaking Gail Goodrich's previous record set on 3/28/72 at Chicago. 
Blake: "I didn’t hesitate at all. I was just excited to get some looks. It felt good from the beginning."  
Bynum on tonight: “It just means that if we play defense we will win games, regardless of how poorly we all shoot and all that other stuff.” 
Bynum: “Wanted to get out early & then play on our D. Obviously when you get up its easier for us to play D & on off we just took our time.” 
Monday 6:30pm PT RT OKC remains in control of this series, but LAL just ensured they'll go back to Oklahoma for Game 5. 
STATS: Kobe 36pts (18/18 FTs) 7rebs 6asts 2stls. Bynum 15pts 11rebs 3blks. 12pts 11rebs 6asts 2blks. Lakers 41/42 from the line. 
Block by Bynum ends it. Lakers take Game 3 99-96. We've got a series. Back at it at STAPLES tomorrow at 7:30pm PT on TNT. Game 4. #GoLakers 
FT 2 = Good. 99-96 Lakers. 9.8 to go. 
FT 1 = Good 
OKC gets the quick two from Perkins. Kobe is fouled by Westbrook & will head back to the line. 
Huddling up for the final 12.9 #GoLakers  
Both are good. 97-94 LA. 
Lakers get the stop & are fouled. MWP heading to the line looking to extend the LA lead with 12.9 remaining. 
Kobe gets cross matched with Westbrook & draws the foul. KB24's 15th & 16th FTs of the night make it 95-95 LA. 33.8 on the clock. #GoLakers 
STAPLES Center on it's feet for the homestretch. Do the same wherever you're watching the game. #GoLakers  
Harden's 5th personal of the game sends Kobe to the line. He knocks down both to give LA a 93-92 lead. 1:09 left in Game 3. #GoLakers 
2 minutes left in this ballgame. 
Harden sends the Lakers into the bonus as LA brings the ball up the court. Kobe buries both, 88-87 OKC. 3:25 left. #GoLakers 
As would say, BLAK3. 
Kobe keeps going to work on FIsh on the post ups. A spinning 13 foot fadeaway gives the Lakers a 78-76 lead. 26 for #24. 7:22 to go. 
That's 29/30 from the line tonight for the Lakers. 
Andrew Bynum continues to force the action inside. He misses LA's 1st FT of the game, but ties it up at 74 w/ the 2nd. Kobe returns, 9:15. 
End of 3 in LA: Thunder 70, Lakers 69. 12 minutes to go. #GoLakers #BeTheDifference 
Ramon Sessions keeps using the "ultra green light" that Mike Brown talked about yesterday. 12pts on 5/8 shooting. 54-51 LA. 
*@LAKings Drew Doughty & shown on the videoboard. Good luck to the Kings Sunday, finish PHX! #GoKingsGo  
Oh, hey having fun tonight? #GoLakers #BeTheDifference  
MWP for 3 to finish the half & give the Lakers a 50-47 lead. 6pts for Metta on 2 from behind the arc. Kobe leads the Lakers w/13pts. 
you mad? 
what does that even mean? 
putting shirts on is going to make them louder? Crowd has been great tonight. 
Us too RT I love I am so glad he is a laker 
Russell Westbrook & MWP pick up matching techs. 
Big block for on Kevin Durant leads to some Kobe FTs (& Harden's 2nd foul). 36-33 LA, 4:33 left in the 2nd. #GoLakers 
yeah Jackie!! 
Check him out RT can we please have Steve Blake's real twitter? Or can you tell him Real LA fans love him! Go Blake! 
Steve Blake follows up his 1st triple of the game w/ a drive to the bucket. 5pts for Blake on 2/3. Lakers lead 30-24. #BeTheDifference 
Here's some pregame behind-the-scenes photos by team photographer Andy Bernstein:  
Great ball movement leads to a 23-15 Lakers lead after the 1st. Bryant & Sessions go for 6pts each, adds 4pts & 6rebs. #GoLakers 
Thunder call a 20 second TO as the Lakers push the lead to 16-4 after the breakaway dunk by Sessions. 7 assists on 8 baskets, sure, why not. 
we got you Leon. Make sure you're following for all the nitty gritty details. 
Most of the lower bowl remaining on their feet during the timeout. STAPLES Center crowd fired up for this one. #GoLakers #BeTheDifference 
8-0 start for the Lakers on the Sessions layin. LA 4/6 with buckets from Bryant, Gasol (4rebs), Bynum & Ramon. OKC starts out 0/5. 
ESPN News until Celtic/76ers concludes. RT Lakers/Thunder tipping on ESPN News right now. 
Intros complete. Bynum lining up at center court across from Ibaka. Game 3 is ready to go. #GoLakers #BeTheDifference 
*@paugasol w/ the J. Walter Kennedy citizenship award for outstanding service & dedication to the community.  
Minutes away:  
Brown on twitter harassment of Steve Blake & his family: "That's not something any of us would like. He's handled it as best as you can." 
Brown on Gasol: "Sometimes because he's known as a nice guy people don't realize the value he brings on the floor & off the floor." 
Mike Brown: "The good thing about this group is that they don't seem to get rattled." 
nice 
Clippers & Spurs are in the same boat. Oh, and the Thunder too obviously. Gotta play the schedule they give ya. 
we give them away for the first game of every playoff series & a couple times during the season. Been doing it for years. 
we give them away for the first game of every playoff series & a couple times during the season. 
Giveaway Shirts for Game 3: "Be the Difference" 18,997 strong at STAPLES Center tonight! #GoLakers  
Friday Night Live is back in the plaza from 5:30-7 PT!! Autographs from AC Green, prizes & more. Be there! 
Let's get it! 
why wouldn't he be? 
do what you gotta do! 
Assistant coach Chuck Person & break down the keys to Game 3 in today's Shootaround Preview:  
Let's do it! 
Kobe talks with Coach Brown while gets free throws up at shootaround.  
It's Game 3 tonight in LA & the Lakers need a win after falling behind 0-2 in OKC. RT this if you're with us for the win!! #GoLakers 
part of the truncated schedule for the shortened season. Playoffs started a week later than normal, end the same time. 
A closer look at some of off the court efforts that led to the award RT More community details:  
Congratulations to the 2011-12 recipient of the J. Walter Kennedy Citizenship Award:  Good job Pau! 
deal 
not how we wanted it to end either, but all we can do is look to Game 3 and get the win at home. #GoLakers 
an unfortunate and ugly situation. Those aren't true Lakers fans doing that. 
Here's Kobe talking about tomorrow's Game 3. He remains confident to say the least.  
always appreciate your positivity and support. 
Andrew Bynum breaks down the Thunder's aggressive style of defense & how the Lakers counteract it:  
WATCH: Mike Brown's comments after today's practice -  
best kind of addiction possible! 
Kobe Bryant: "I've been here before, I've communicated that, we'll be ready tomorrow." 
Andrew Bynum maintains that the Lakers remain confident because they know how to defend OKC. Metta: "We don't get down on each other." 
That's the plan. Back-to-back games at STAPLES this weekend. RT lets come back and win GM 3 & 4 at home. 
The Lakers landed back in LA at 2am last night. They'll report back to the training facility for practice at 2pm today to prep for Game 3. 
Postgame Numbers:  A look back at some of the tougher numbers from Game 2's last minute loss. Game 3 in 31.5 hours. 
Bynum on the last two minutes: "Oh my goodness, we're better than Santa Claus. Gave them a gift." 
Lakers drop Game 2 in OKC 77-75 & trail the series 2-0. Game 3 back in LA on Friday at 7:30pm PT on TNT. 
Thunder use their foul to give on the bump by Sefolosha. Lakers retain possession on the side with 5.7 left. 
Lakers concede an 8-0 run to the Thunder and trail 76-75 with 18.6 left in Game 2. Lakers ball. 
Baseline lefty hook by Bynum pushes the lead to 75-68 with 2:08 left. Lakers huddle at center court before heading to the bench to talk. 
Bryant & Bynum check back in w/ 9:06 to go. A Harden triple erased the Lakers advantage after a couple empty LA possessions. Tied up at 63. 
Lakers start the 4th quarter with Sessions, Barnes, Metta, HIll & Gasol. 12 minutes to go. 
Low scoring 3rd quarter favors the Lakers 18-12 to give them a 63-60 lead after 3 in OKC. Bryant & Bynum w/ 16pts each. 
Lakers start the 3rd quarter on a 6-0 run (4 from Gasol, 2 from Bynum) to lead 51-48. OKC 0/7 from the field this quarter. 
Lakers fans & getting love on the OKC videoboard during the 1st half of Game 2.  
Halftime: Thunder 48, Lakers 45. Bynum going to work in the paint for 12pts & 5rebs. Kobe adds 10pts & 3stls along w/LA's only 3asts. 
best in the game at it 
Pau Gasol checks in for after he picks up his 3rd foul. Nice effort off the bench for HIll, 6pts & 3rebs (2 offensive). 
First game of every playoff series we give out shirts. 
Andrew Bynum sinks both free throws to pull the Lakers within 2 at 16-14. 6 early pts for Bynum. 
STARTERS: Sessions, Bryant, & Bynum vs. Westbrook, Sefolosha, Durant, Ibaka & Perkins. Players ready for tipoff. 
Gametime.  
Steve Blake warming up for Game 2.  
Less than 3 hours to go.  
Ebanks & Bynum Fined:  
Lakers look to even the series with the Thunder tonight in Game 2. Catch the action live on TNT & 710ESPN starting at 6:30pm PT. 
WATCH:  - & go in-depth on Game 1 & the talk around Tuesday's practice in OKC. 
Here's Kobe Bryant talking to the media after today's practice in OKC:  
Head coach Mike Brown talks about the adjustments the Lakers need to make for Wednesday night's Game 2:  
Kobe talking to the media:  
The Lakers are just finishing up practice at the arena.  
Lakers lose Game 1 in Oklahoma City 119-90. Game 2 is set for Wednesday night at 6:30pm PT on TNT and 710ESPN. 
Thunder shoot 12/17 (70.5%) in the 3rd quarter as they outscore the Lakers 39-24. After 3 quarters it's OKC 98, LA 68. 
Lakers trail at the half 59-44. Thunder turn 8 LA turnovers into 16pts, while committing just 1 TO & shooting 53.3%. 
Lakers trail after the 1st quarter 30-23. Thunder capitalizing on 2nd chance points 11-0. 10pts, 5rebs & a block for Bynum. #GoLakers 
*@MettaWorldPeace starts the game 2/2 from 3pt land & dishes an assist to Bynum for a dunk. Lakers lead 12-6 after 3 minutes. #GoLakers 
Bynum wins the tip & the second round is underway. #GoLakers 
As expected, Metta was not well received by the OKC crowd. As is also common place, Kobe got the second loudest boos. #GoLakers 
STARTERS: Sessions, Bryant, & Bynum vs. Westbrook, Sefolosha, Durant, Ibaka & Perkins. #GoLakers 
Warmups. Game 1 starts momentarily on TNT. #GoLakers  
Metta in OKC. Tip-off in one hour.  
Brown on dealing w/ noise: "I think they're OK w/ it. Especially Kobe, he's been-there done-that quite a bit. I think that's infectious." 
nice! 
The Lakers first bus, filled with Ramon Sessions, & is headed to the arena for Game 1. #GoLakers 
The media contingent grows as the rounds advance:  
Mike Brown on the quick turnaround: "It does seem rushed, but that's ok, this whole season felt rushed." 
Game 1 shootaround just wrapping up:  
Game 1 tonight in OKC (6:30pm PT, TNT). Here's your full A-Z preview of the series by  #GoLakers 
Before Round 2 gets going, take a look back at the graphics for each Round 1 win. #GoLakers  
Welcome to Oklahoma:  
yup 
nice 
We're in the air right now headed to OKC. RT when is the team flying out ? 
Good luck to the tonight! #BLACKOUTTHEWHITEOUT RT Kobe Bryant sends his support to #LAKings fans.  
Here's your second round Lakers/Thunder schedule wallpaper:  Spruce up those desktops now. #GoLakers 
not quite yet, but almost. 
working on it right now. 
Happy Mother's Day!! If your Mom is a Lakers fan give her a kiss.  
I'm sure can take care of that request for ya. 
back-to-back games 3 & 4 at STAPLES. 
we give out shirts for Game 1 of every playoff series. 
Advance:  
*@paugasol on OKC: "I think we know them pretty well... we know who we're facing & how hard it's going to be."  
Steve Blake on his 19pts: "This is really when it counts right now, this is when you want to be making shots" -  
"It was great because we did it together... we stuck together." -  
WATCH:  Kobe after last night's Game 7 victory. 
Kobe gets a high five from after nailing a 3 late in the 4th.  
#12togo #GoLakers  
Here's your complete 2nd round playoff schedule for the Lakers/Thunder series:  
Lakers advance to the 2nd round with the 96-87 Game 7 victory over Game 1 vs. is Monday night in OKC. #GoLakers 
Bynum heading to the line with 12.3 seconds left and the Lakers up by 8. 
2:53 left in Game 7, Lakers lead 85-80. Huge games for the big guys: Gasol 21pts, 17rebs & 4blks. Bynum 10pts, 16rebs & 5blks. #GoLakers 
Deep 25 footer from Steve Blake puts the Lakers back on top 75-73 with 8:45 to go. Blake's 4th triple of the game for 16pts. 
Lakers push the lead as high as 16pts, but at the end of the 3rd quarter they lead by just a single point, 69-68. 12 minutes to go. 
22-6 run for Denver. RT At the 7:22 mark, LAL led 62-46 on Bryant's lefty layup. It's now 68-all after 2 Harrington FT's. 
appreciate the long distance support! 
The team gathered out near center court during that last stoppage. STAPLES Center  
Halftime: Lakers 48, Nuggets 42. Great half for 13pts, 7rebs, 5asts & a block. Blake with the big 3s for 11pts off the bench. 
X3 RT BLAK3 
Pau followed up his breakaway slam with the And-1 layin to make it 35-31 Lakers with 6:52 to go in the half. 11pts on 5/7 for Gasol. 
Hot offensive starts for both teams from the field. Lakers lead 25-24 after the 1st. 
let's get it! 
7-0 run for the Lakers make it 25-22 in favor of the home team with 1:43 left in the 1st. Gasol & Bynum combine for 11pts, Kobe adds 4. 
Everyone standing during intros. Tip coming up momentarily. STAPLES Center  
Gametime. #GoLakers  
Metta:  
2 hours STAPLES Center  
*@MettaWorldPeace is back tonight. You remember what happened last time he played in a Game 7 right?  
Who's ready for Game 7? (Tip at 7:30pm PT on TNT & 710ESPN) 
feel good about it 
Like in 2010 
Kobe on Game 7s: "Energy in the building. Team's play w/a sense of desperation. It's a fun thing to be apart of." -  
Pau Gasol: "Everything that has happened has to be behind... What we need to focus on is tomorrow, it's a final." -  
Ramon Sessions: "We've got one more left, time to see what we're made of." -  
Brown: "I don't like the way we played yesterday... (the bigs) can impact the game in a lot of different ways" -  
"I feel a lot better today. I slept till about one o'clock, so I feel a lot better." - Kobe Bryant  
Back to practice in LA:  
"I can't be any more motivated than I am right now" -  
After last night's game, Kobe Bryant talked about playing in Game 7s over his career:  
WATCH:  Andrew Bynum talks about last night's Game 6 loss in Denver. 
Final: Denver 113, Lakers 96. The deciding Game 7 will be back at STAPLES Center Saturday night at 7:30pm PT (TV: FS West & TNT). 
Lakers get outscored in the 3rd quarter 36-23 to fall behind 90-68 with just 12 minutes remaining. 
After a long consultation the officials rule the final basket good: Nuggets 54, Lakers 45 at the half. Kobe 19pts on 7/13. Sessions adds 10. 
The 1st FG from a Lakers big (Bynum, Gasol, Hill) comes at the 5:59 mark in the 2nd quarter as Jordan knocks down an 18 footer. 40-30 DEN. 
Lakers allow Denver to jump out to a 13-0 lead & trail 30-20 after the 1st quarter. Kobe leads LA w/10pts despite his sick stomach. 
Kobe gets the Lakers on the board. 13-2. RT LAL need a bucket to settle the crowd. Louder than at any point of Games 3-4. 
Kobe out on the floor for warmups. Tip right around the corner. #GoLakers  
Mike Brown on Kobe's status: "Our trainer Gary Vitti told me that he's holding down fluids." Bryant will play in tonight's Game 6. 
Kobe Bryant arriving for Game 6:  
We'll know more in about 20 minutes when Mike Brown meets with the media. RT any news on Kobe ...or is it the same status 
A view of the arena in Denver from the team bus. Lakers go to work here in just over two hours.  
Game 6 tonight in Denver (7:30pm PT | KCAL/9, TNT). Lakers lead the series 3-2. #GoLakers  
Kobe talking with as the team arrives at the hotel in Denver.  
Game 6 is Thursday in Denver. Next game would be Saturday. 
to be determined 
yup 
The Lakers will be playing this Saturday whether it be Game 7 vs. or Game 1 of the 2nd round vs. Times TBD. 
Game 5 Photo Gallery:  
Metta serves the last game of his suspension tomorrow night. 
Kobe: "Didn't play w/ the kind of effort that we should... have to do a better job in knocking down timely shots" -  
Mike Brown on last night's loss: "We didn't have any flow, we were stagnant, we didn't get the ball reversals."  
Andrew Bynum on the importance of getting down the court early -  
Pau Gasol: "We're going to have to find ways to get the ball into the post with different actions." -  
Game 6 will be back in Denver Thursday night at 7:30pm PT on KCAL/9 & TNT. Lakers lead the series 3-2. See you then. 
Lakers work the ball over to Kobe but both his & Sessions 3pt attempts won't go. Lakers lose Game 5 102-99. 
Need 1 more RT The Lakers are 7 for 10 from 3-pt range in the 4th. Kobe hit 4 of them, all within a 4-minute stretch. 
Miller rims home the 1st & makes the 2nd. Nuggets 102, Lakers 99. 12.8 left. #GoLakers 
Lawson heads to line & makes 1/2. Lakers down 4pts at 100-96. 19.2 seconds remaining. #GoLakers 
Harrington makes 1/2 to push the Nuggets lead to 99-96. Lakers ball with 28.6 left. #GoLakers 
Back-to-back-to-back triples for Kobe Bryant. Mamba up to 43 points. Lakers down 2. 
Crowd getting back into it as Bynum's slam cuts the Nuggets lead to 94-87 with 2:41 to go. Drew heading to the line. #GoLakers 
Lakers trail 76-65 after 3 quarters in Game 5. Kobe Bryant leads all scorers with 29pts. 
Halftime: Nuggets 49, Lakers 43. Not LA's best half of the playoffs, but they trail by just 6pts. Kobe's got 18pts, Bynum adds 7 & 7. 
Slow start from the field for the Lakers as they shoot just 34%, but the Bynum alley-oop & FTs cut Denver's lead to just 26-23 after 1. 
let's do it! 
Thanks man 
Game 5 coming up on FS West & TNT. #GoLakers  
nice 
we'll handle it for ya. Good luck on your final. 
Awesome look coming down the homestretch!! RT Kentucky Derby winners &  
WATCH: Assistant coach Chuck Person & talks close out games -  
Game 5 tonight in LA (7:30PT, & TNT). Win & the Lakers are headed to the 2nd round, lose & it's back to Denver. #GoLakers 
we'll hold it down for ya 
18 hours before tip of Game 5 RT Staples Center, 1:40 am PT  
Practice Video before Game 5 - Bryant:  // Bynum:  // Brown:  
Stay safe out there Flea! RT Behind enemy lines  
Where's Steve Blake the day after hitting a game winning 3? Right back out behind the arc getting better.  
Jordan Hill has tallied double-digit boards in 3/4 games this series while playing just 20mpg off the bench:  
Postgame #'s from the Lakers Game 4 win:  
Steve Blake: "He trusts us. That's what it's going to take to be a really good team. To trust each other."  
Takes 16 victories to win the Larry O'Brien trophy, we've got #13togo RT what does #13Togo mean ? 
Kobe: "George... saw I was pissed, didn't think I was going to trust them... they stepped up & knocked them down."  
Jordan Hill: "We just wanted it more. Went out there defended well, helped each other out on defense... we got it."  
Lakers got home around 1:30am last night, already back to work. #13togo RT Mornin yall...Bout to get in the cold tub 
boom! 
love our fans 
Ramon: "They just forgot about me in the corner, big fella set a good screen & I was able to hit a wide open shot."  
WATCH:  Andrew Bynum talks about big night along with the 3's by Sessions & Blake. 
"It's always a good thing when you get a hug from Kobe" - Steve Blake. Lakers lead the series 3-1.  
Lakers team plane is on it's way back to LA, who was your player of the game? We know Metta's. RT Steve Blake...Wow!!!! 
#13togo  
Steve Blake at the podium. Pepsi Center  
Jordan Hill on Sessions' & Blake's big 3's: "Oh man, we definitely needed those. I was jumping out of my seat." 
Andrew Bynum made a point to mention contributions as the key to the win along with Blake & Sessions big 3s. 
STATS: Kobe 22pts 8rebs 6asts. Bynum 19pts 7rebs 3blks. 12pts 11rebs (7 offensive). Rebounds 48-38 Lakers. #GoLakers 
Lakers take a 3-1 series lead over the Nuggets with the 92-88 Game 4 victory. LA can close it out at STAPLES on Tuesday night. #GoLakers 
Kobe runs the shot clock all the way down before dishing it to Blake in the right corner for the triple that puts LA up 92-86. 18.9 left. 
Ramon answers back with a corner triple to put the Lakers up 89-86 with 48.1 seconds remaining. 12pts for Sessions. 
Denver ball with 2:36 remaining, Lakers up 86-84. LA rolling with Sessions, Blake, Bryant, Gasol & Bynum in crunch time. #GoLakers 
That put back slam gives Hill another double-double at 12pts & 10rebs. RT Well, then. Jordan Hill. 
Lakers up 78-76 as Kobe comes back into the game for the stretch run. Nuggets ball. 
More on the offensive glass. His 6th offensive reb of the game gives him 9 total to go along w/ 9pts as he heads to the line. 
Lakers continue to struggle from deep, but trail just 71-70 after 3 quarters. 12 minutes left to go up 3-1 or head back to LA tied at 2. 
nice 
boom! 
Lakers controlling the pace. RT Karl: "We've got to get our offensive tempo going and get more aggressive defensively." 
Lakers back in the lead at 57-56 after starting the 3rd quarter on a 12-5 run. 4pts a piece from Kobe, Drew & Pau. 
Two of Andrew Bynum's 11 first half points.  
pretty sure everyone saw her on the court, she almost stole the ball from Lawson. 
Bynum's got 11pts & 4rebs on 5/6 shooting to go along with two blocks. Hardly a no show. 
no idea. Never seen that, usually the courtside people are pretty well behaved. 
Back and forth first half sees the Lakers trailing 51-45. Kobe Bryant & Andrew Bynum account for 23pts. adds 7pts & 5rebs. 
that was strange... 
a tough choice, but the right one Bob. Appreciate the support. 
Another solid contribution from tonight, 4pts & 5rebs in 7 minutes of play. Lakers lead 35-34 with 7:25 left in the half. 
End of the 1st quarter: Nuggets 28, Lakers 26. Andrew Bynum comes out hot early, 4/4 from the field for 9pts. 
Lakers tied up with the Nuggets at 16 w/ Kobe going to the line to finish up the and-1. Bryant & Bynum leading the way with 5pts each. 
Bynum & Mozgov are lined up in the center circle for the tip. #GoLakers 
STARTERS: Sessions, Bryant, & Bynum vs. Lawson, Afflalo, Gallinari, Faried & Mozgov. KCAL/9 in LA, TNT nationally. 
Andrew Bynum out on the court getting loose.  
90 Minutes till tip. #GoLakers RT Go Lakers!!!!!!! 
yup 
definitely! 
nice collection. Sweet RHCP Lakers shirt. 
Kobe Bryant: "It's always funny to hear the "Kobe Sucks" chant because why provoke me... It's fun." 
Kobe Bryant: "It's always funny to hear the "Kobe Sucks" chant because why provoke me... It's fun." 
Shootaround in Denver:  
there's never a time when that's a bad idea. #GoLakers 
Lakers hoops is the perfect compliment to breakfast 
Lakers carry a 2-1 lead into tonight's Game 4 against the Nuggets in Denver. Tip at 6:30pm PT on KCAL/9, TNT & 710ESPN. #GoLakers 
great pic! 
Happy Cinco de Mayo Lakers fans!! Be safe out there.  
Before practice Saturday Kobe went over a bunch of things that happened in Game 3 & how they pertain to Sunday.  
Bynum on his poor 1st half in Game 3 & the adjustments he made in the 2nd half that will carry over to Game 4:  
WATCH:  on working in the post against the Nuggets bigs & being consistent from start to finish. 
Mike Brown talks about what went wrong in Game 3 & understanding the double teams in the post:  
hanging out at the right place at the right time! 
Kobe talking with the media prior to Saturday's practice.  
awesome 
Kobe Bryant: "I wasn't in the post a lot. I basically lived in the post, on the elbow, the 1st 2 games." -  
Postgame Numbers from the Lakers first road game of the postseason:  
Lakers drop Game 3 to the Nuggets in Denver 99-84. Game 4 is set for Sunday night at 6:30pm PT. Lakers lead the series 2-1. 
Drew's got 14 & 11 and was a huge part of cutting into the lead in the 3rd quarter. 
well played 
Lakers outscore the Nuggets 26-17 in the 3rd quarter to cut Denver's lead down to just 72-65. 12pts & 4rebs for Bynum in the 3rd. #GoLakers 
Halftime: Nuggets 55, Lakers 39. LA getting beat in pretty much every statistic: Pts in Paint 26-16, Rebs 31-18, 2nd chance pts 11-6. 
Three more games and we'll have Metta back 
Doris is really good at what she does. 
Lakers answer back with a 14-4 run of their own, but still trail 45-31 with 5:47 left in the half. Kobe leading the way with 11pts. 
Nuggets feeding off the home crowd's energy as they jump out to a 30-14 1st qtr lead on the Lakers. Zero fast-break & 2nd chance pts for LA. 
it's early 
nice shot 
STARTERS: Sessions, Bryant, & Bynum vs. Lawson, Afflalo, Gallinari, Faired & Mozgov. KCAL/9 in LA, ESPN otherwise. 
We do too.  
#GoLakers #NBAPlayoffs RT Let's go Lakers!!!! 
love the dedication 
*@paugasol arriving at the arena for Game 3.  
that's dedication 
awesome! 
sweet! 
7:30pm PT on KCAL/9 in LA and ESPN everywhere else. 
We are. RT tonight! Who's ready!? 
New story on the website:  takes a look at transition D with head coach Mike Brown. 
Gameday in Denver. Can the Lakers go up 3-0? Find out at 7:30pm PT on KCAL/9, ESPN and 710ESPN. #GoLakers #NBAPlayoffs 
Ramon Sessions doing an interview with at the team hotel:  
that's right 
tomorrow will be here soon enough. 
no problem 
see ya tomorrow night! 
awesome 
*@Matt_Barnes22 & the Lakers have arrived in Denver for Game 3.  
Love the support from our crew. RT Always reppin the & Santos  
Post practice interviews prior to flying out to Denver. Bryant:  Coach Brown:  
Kobe speaking with the media:  
We're back at it tomorrow in Denver. RT I hate when the have a couple days off before playing another game. 
Our second playoff podcast features talking with before the team heads to Denver:  
Congrats ace/LAL fan on the no-no RT Lakers towel in Weaver's lkr. From 2011 playoffs  
Take a room by room look at the Lakers training facility in the Lakers Virtual Locker Room Tour:  
Who wants to help him out? RT what are 5 words to describe Kobe Bryant..need it for a project 
Photo Gallery from last night's Game 2:  
WATCH:  Inside Trax from Game 2. Great behind-the-scenes stuff with the coaches. 
.@MagicJohnson: "I owe a lot to Dr. Jerry Buss. He talked to me every day about making sure I was making the right decisions with my money." 
9 of 20 rebs through the first two games of the Playoffs have been on the offensive glass.  
We only play for titles. RT how come you guys don't hang the division banners? 
2-0 #NBAPlayoffs  
From the Locker Room: Kobe Bryant -  
From the Locker Room:  Andrew Bynum on tonight's win over the Nuggets. 
From the Locker Room:  Ramon Sessions on the Game 2 win. 
Streamers raining down at STAPLES Center.  
STATS: Kobe 38pts (15/29) 4rebs. Bynum 27pts 9rebs 2blks. 13pts 10rebs 2blks. 6pts 10rebs off the bench. 
Lakers take the 2-0 series lead with a 104-100 victory over the Nuggets. Series moves to Denver for Game 3, Friday night at 7:30pm PT. 
Two Ramon Sessions free throws push the Lakers lead back up to 102-96 with just 20.9 seconds remaining. 14pts for Ramon. 
Lakers up 92-83 w/ 5:54 left here at STAPLES. Nice to see Captain among the courtside celebs.  
Reggie Evans is their Jordan Hill.... 
12 more points for Kobe in the 3rd quarter give him 33 on the night as the Lakers maintain an 81-74 lead with 12 minutes remaining in Game 2 
our pleasure, have a good time. 
Lakers shoot 53.3% from the field & hold Denver to just 38.5% shooting, but get out rebounded 30-23. 
Halftime: Lakers 55, DEN 48. Kobe going on a scoring binge, 9/12 FGs for 21pts. Bynum 17pts & 6rebs. w/4 & 7 off the bench. 
just to support the knee, been wearing it all year 
c'mon, the boo will understand 
Kobe's triple caps off a 32-25 quarter in the Lakers favor. 14pts for the Black Mamba on 6/8 shooting. Bynum adds 10pts & 5rebs. 
14ft of fast break leads to a Gasol-to-Bynum alley-oop quickly followed by another Bynum slam that gives LA a 12-3 lead. DEN timeout. 
Lakers hit the floor for Game 2:  
STARTERS: Sessions, Bryant, & Bynum vs. Lawson, Afflalo, Gallinari, Faried & Koufos. TV: FS West & TNT. 
Pregame stretches with Andrew Bynum:  
Mike Brown says the Lakers know that the Nuggets will come out even harder tonight & it's important to control the tempo even more than Gm 1 
gotta be quick on Twitter, it's an instantaneous medium. 
7:30pm PT on & TNT 
Congratulations to & her coworkers, you've got some tickets on the way for tonight's game for this:  
awesome 
nice 
that's not a real question is it? 
close but not quite 
Who's got their office dressed up for the Lakers playoff run? Send us a pic & let us know where you work. 
How many blocks to you think Bynum will have tonight? Limited tickets are still available to see it live:  
Here's today's Shootaround Preview w/ Chuck Person & talking adjustments for Game 2:  
he looks intense. 
Head coach Mike Brown on Jordan Hill's availability for tonight: "He's playing." #fb 
Preview Podcast:  & preview Game 2 & talk about what Bynum's big Game 1 might mean. 
Game 2 tonight in LA vs. the Nuggets. Tip at 7:30pm PT on TNT & 710ESPN. Lakers lead the series 1-0. 
We'll keep it going tomorrow night. RT OK and we kept the LA Winning Streak alive. You're up. 
Kobe Bryant speaks with the media following today's practice:  
Andrew Bynum surrounded by the media after practice.  
Jordan Hill Statement:  
Lakers en Espanol: Juego 1 -  con y 
Photos from yesterday's Game 1:  
#BlockParty  
How are you celebrating the Game 1 victory? 
From the Locker Room:  Kobe Bryant talks about the Game 1 win. 
From the Locker Room:  Andrew Bynum talks about his first career triple-double. 
From the Locker Room:  talks about Game 1. 
From the Locker Room:  talks about his double-double performance in Game 1. 
Record setting day for Andrew Bynum & the Lakers.  
Lakers take Game 1 over the Nuggets 103-88. 6 Lakers in double figures led by 31pts from Kobe. Game 2 is Tuesday at STAPLES. #15togo 
Bynum's Triple-Double Stat Line  
There's block #10 for Andrew Bynum, setting a franchise record and tying an NBA playoff record. 
12 minutes left here at STAPLES Center, Lakers ahead 77-64. Dbl-dbl for Bynum: 10pts, 12rebs. Gasol leading the team w/ 7asts. 
Nuggets call a timeout as Kobe's deuce gives the Lakers their biggest lead of the day at 71-52. 17pts for #24 to lead all scorers. 
appreciate it 
nice! 
That's Bynum's 6th block of the day for those counting at home. 
STAPLES Center pano right before intros.  
At halftime it's Lakers 50, Nuggets 40. leads LA w/12pts. Bynum controlling the paint--9rebs & 4blks. Holding DEN to 36%. 
There ya go boys! RT Showing our pride   
Got a standing O from the crowd of 18,997. RT A kid just buried a FT & then an NBA 3-pointer to win $6,000 between qtrs. 
Steve Blake is bombing from 3 point land. His third triple of the quarter gives the Lakers a 27-14 lead after 12 minutes. 
STARTERS: Sessions, Bryant, & Bynum vs. Lawson, Afflalo, Gallinari, Faried & Koufos. 12:30pm PT tip on ABC. 
Pregame Tunnel  
welcome 
Mike Brown: "Speaking of hockey, let me give the a shout out. Good win guys."  
Sunday Whites  
Gameday in LA. RT this if you're ready for Game 1.  
PREVIEW:  & go in-depth on the Lakers/Nuggets 1st round series. Watch it. 
SERIES PREVIEW:  Chuck Person & break down everything you need to know about Lakers-Nuggets. 
WATCH:  Kobe Bryant talks about the challenges the Nuggets present. 
Matt Barnes: "I'm gonna play. I'm gonna play no matter what."  
*@Matt_Barnes22 working out on the court:  
Andrew Bynum & working against each other 1-on-1  
New Story on  Lakers/Nuggets 1st Round A-Z Preview:  Which of these 26 is most important to you? 
We enlisted team photographer to talk about & his role w/ the play &  
ICYMI: First Round Lakers/Nuggets Desktop Schedule Wallpaper - Download yours:  // View it:  
First Round Lakers/Nuggets Desktop Schedule Wallpaper - Download yours here:  // View it here:  
Lakers drop the regular season finale 113-96 to the Sacramento Kings. The second season begins Sunday at STAPLES against the Nuggets. 
Tomorrow most likely RT When will the first-round schedule wallpaper come out? 
Tomorrow most likely RT When will the first-round schedule wallpaper come out? 
Complete 1st Round Playoff Schedule vs.  Gm 1 & 2: SUN/TUE at STAPLES. Gm 3 & 4: FRI/SUN in Denver. 
Lakers down 56-43 at the half. 
Lakers trail the Kings 35-24 after one quarter in Sacramento. & w/ 6pts & 3rebs each. 
Lakers getting set to tip it off on KCAL/9 against the Kings. Sessions, Blake, Ebanks, McRoberts & Hill starting for the purple & gold. 
The full playoff schedule will be released later tonight. 
The Lakers will start their Western Conference quarterfinals matchup against the this Sunday at STAPLES. 
Special on this Kobe jersey, ONLY $27.90 in honor of his PPG this season. Valid until 7:15pm PT or until sold out.  
you can watch it on futurecast free on  
The are up 1-0 in their best of 3 finals series. Game 2 is tonight at 7pm, will you be there?  
Kobe Bryant is 38 points away from the 2011-12 scoring title. Should he go for it tonight or rest up for the playoffs? 
Lakers close out the regular season tonight vs. at 7:30pm PT on KCAL/9 & 710ESPN. 
The Lakers will open their playoff campaign at home this Sunday. Time and opponent (DEN or DAL) to be determined. 
OFFICIAL: has been recalled from He'll be available for tomorrow's game in Sacramento.  
WATCH:  Metta World Peace talks for the first time about his 7gm suspension. 
Head coach Mike Brown talks about Metta World Peace's 7gm suspension & how the team will fill the void:  
New poll question:  Head over to our facebook page to make your voice heard. 
The Lakers don't hang banners for division championships, but if they did, there would be 23 of them in the STAPLES Center rafters. 
With ATL's 109-102 win over the Clippers the Lakers clinch the Pacific Division & the 3 seed in the West. DEN/DAL battling for the 6 spot. 
Lakers GM Mitch Kupchak's statement on the suspension has been added to this story:  
Full press release from the NBA regarding Metta World Peace's 7 game suspension:  
Metta World Peace has been suspended for seven games without pay for striking the Thunder's James Harden in the head with his elbow. 
WATCH: Kobe Bryant ( & Mike Brown ( spoke with the media following Tuesday's practice. 
Here's alongside the explaining the next activity at LAL's Fit For Life event:  
Camp Lakers is back for it's 13th summer. Learn more about it here:  
A night after Kobe led LAL to the double OT W over OKC, here he is at the Youth Foundation dinner:  
Always easy to spot in a room, here chatting with a golf tourney guest:  
Q: "Do you think this is a championship team?" Kobe: "We are." Bryant explains why in this video:  
the playoff schedule won't be announced until the completion of the regular season. 
Kobe. Bean. Bryant. Did you expect anything less from KB24 yesterday?  
nice! 
What was your favorite part of performance today?  
From the Locker Room:  Kobe Bryant on today's comeback win & the Lakers unsung heros today. 
From the Locker Room:  on his breakout 14pt, 15reb performance in Sunday's win over OKC. 
From the Locker Room:  on today's comeback win, Jordan Hill & the importance of momentum. 
POSTGAME:  HC Mike Brown breaks down Kobe's leadership, contributions & more after the game. 
WORLD PEACE STATEMENT:  "I got real excited & it was unfortunate that James had to get hit w/an unintentional elbow" 
STATS: Bryant 26pts 6rebs 8asts 48mins. 20pts 14rebs 9asts 49mins. 14pts 15rebs 3blks 35mins. 
After being down by as many as 18 points the Lakers prevail in the double-OT thriller over the OKC Thunder 114-106. LAL now 41-24 overall. 
It's a standing O from the Lakers fans at STAPLES Center as heads to the line. #GoLakers 
Kobe fist pumps at half court after Ebanks sinks both free throws to up the Lakers advantage to 110-104. 24.5 remaining. 
Kobe hits the tough 16-footer then races the other way after an Ebanks steal & is fouled. Both FTs are good. Lakers up 108-104. 36.9 to go. 
Refs reverse the call to give it to OKC. Lakers lead 104-102 with 1:18 remaining in the second overtime period. 
Double OT coming up at STAPLES Center. 97 all. #GoLakers 
Jordan HIll's 13th rebound of the day leads to an extra possession for the Lakers, but Kobe can't cash it. 15.1 left, OKC ball. Tied at 97. 
Blake, Bryant, Ebanks, HIll and Gasol on the floor to start the OT for LA. 
Mamba. #GoLakers  
Last shot won't go for the Durant. We're headed to overtime at STAPLES Center tied up at 91 all. 
Another rise and fire triple from Kobe pushes the Lakers back ahead. 91-89. #GoLakers 
Official review Kobe's bucket & declare it a 3. 1:12 left. Lakers up 88-87. 
Shot clock beating one-footed 3 from Kobe at the top puts the Lakers ahead at 88-87. 
STAPLES Center on it's feet as the Lakers get the stop & head the other way with a chance to tie or take the lead. 
Lakers ball RT Wow - Kobe and Ibaka just went flying, full speed, into the courtside chairs. Think they just missed Denzel! 
Steve Blake's triple from the top of the arc makes it a five-point game at 87-82 with 3:18 left. 8pts on the day for Steve. 
Another lackluster 3rd quarter for the Lakers. OKC wins the q 25-14 to surge ahead 77-61. 
Congratulations to Brett, he's taking home a brand new 2012 Camry after winning the finals of the Skills Challenge.  
Lakers trail at the half 52-47. Balanced half from 7pts, 5rebs, 6asts. Sessions adds 8pts & 3asts. 
With Matt Barnes having his ankle looked at earlier in the game, Devin Ebanks will replace Metta in the lineup for the Lakers. 
Metta World Peace has been ejected from the game for a flagrant II foul for elbowing Thunder guard James Harden. 
A big Happy Birthday salute to legendary Lakers fan Jack Nicholson.  
.@jordanchill43 exits to a big applause from the STAPLES Center crowd. 6pts, 4rebs & a block for hill in his 9 minutes of action today. 
Yup, you can find him at RT is jordan hill on twitter? 
yup, Jordan uses 
Lakers fall behind by as many as 11pts but reel off a quick 9-0 run over the last 1:58 to cut the Thunder lead to 37-35. 
appreciate the long-distance/early morning support! 
you're a good aunt! 
it's early still for Kobe 
strong signs, but could do without the green on the middle one! #GoLakers 
Lakers down 26-20 after the 1st quarter. leads LA with 6pts & 3rebs. Lakers shoot just 8/22 in the quarter. 
good times! 
appreciate the support 
reppin' the old school #8! 
what's up Alberto! 
appreciate that! 
great seats! 
cool man 
haha hopefully not. Metta appears to be ok after getting cracked in the face. 
there ya go Ozzie 
nice 
glad you could join us! 
beautiful day to watch some hoops 
haha 
yup 
appreciate the long distance support 
very nice. Don't let us distract you... too much. 
love the socks 
great spot 
good setup 
nice 
what time is it over there? 
Where's everyone watching the game today? Send us your pics. 
STARTERS: Sessions, Bryant, & Bynum vs. Westbrook, Sefolosha, Durant, Ibaka & Perkins. TV: ABC // RADIO: 710ESPN 
see ya soon! 
appreciate it 
Two hours until tip STAPLES Center  
WATCH:  Assistant coach Chuck Person breaks down the keys to today's matchup with the Thunder. 
It's a Sunday afternoon matchup of the Western Conference 2 & 3 seeds. Lakers vs 12:30pm PT live from STAPLES on ABC & 710ESPN. 
Congrats boys! RT The D-Fenders have advanced to the Finals for the first time in team history! 
WATCH:  Kobe Bryant talks following practice about the NBAPA, the scoring title & LAL's struggles w/ P&R defense. 
Kobe getting extra shots up after Saturday's practice session.  
Final from San Antonio: Spurs 121, Lakers 97. Back home on Sunday to host the Thunder at 12:30pm PT on ABC. 
San Antonio wins the 3rd quarter by a decisive 35-21 margin to take a 91-73 lead with just 12 minutes remaining. 
Lakers trail by just four, 56-52, at the half despite SA shooting 57.5% (5/7 from 3). sparks the bench with 8pts. 
Lakers fall behind 32-25 after the 1st. Kobe plays the entire quarter, going 2/4 from the field for 5pts. Bynum leads the team with 10pts. 
Kobe's back in the starting lineup after missing the previous 7 games. Tune in on KCAL/9 or ESPN to see the Lakers take on the Spurs. 
20 minutes till tip in SA RT Ready to see my take on the spurs tonight with Kobe back. I'm hoping for a great game. 
he'll be out there tonight 
Kobe is expected to play tonight, more on that here:  RT is kobe playing? 
Lakers take on the for the third and final time in the regular season tonight. 6:30pm PT tip on KCAL/9, ESPN & 710ESPN. 
great pics! 
Score big in the playoffs. Get the Lakers Prepaid Card. No activation fee. Open to SoCal residents in Lakers territory.  
If you missed anything from last night's 99-87 win, highlights, photos and more are at:  
Lakers finish off the Warriors 99-87 to take their record to 40-23. Bynum 31p 9r, Pau 21p 11r 11a, MWP 18p 9a. 
The Lakers will take an 84-67 lead into the 4th. Bynum 31p 9r, Pau 20p 9r 9a, as a team the Lakers have 28 assists on 31 baskets. 
After pushing the lead to 17, the Lakers lead 56-48 at the half. Warriors used a zone to take the Lakers out of their offensive rhythm. 
Lakers lead 32-26 after 1st quarter thanks to consistent work in the paint, led by Bynum, who scored 17. 
Nice photo! 
Nope. Mike Brown confirmed in pre game interviews that Kobe continues to progress, but won't play tonight at GSW. 
Lakers (39-23) hit the road to take on the Golden State (22-38). Tip-off is set for 7:30pm PT on KCAL/9, ESPN & 710ESPN. 
The Lakers drop their second meeting with the Spurs 112-91 Tuesday night at STAPLES Center. LAL takes on GSW tomorrow in Oakland. 
End of the 3rd: Spurs 91, Lakers 70. San Antonio shooting a scorching 64.6% from the field. 
Spurs use an 18-0 run in the middle of the 2nd quarter to grab a 63-47 halftime lead. SA has turned 13 LA turnovers into 20pts. 
it's a good look right? 
Tune in now to hear w/ & MT RT Bieber on  
Lakers with the one point lead over the Spurs, 28-27, after the 1st thanks to Bynum's 13pts on 6/9 shooting. Both teams shoot 54.5%. 
STARTERS: Ramon Sessions, & Andrew Bynum. In LA watch on Prime Ticket, everywhere else on TNT. 
See if the Lakers can repeat their command performance from last Wed. vs. Get Premier Seats for tonight’s game:  
WATCH:  Assistant coach Chuck Person breaks down tonight's game against the Spurs. 
Wondering where gets the confidence to knock down back-to-back threes in crunch time? Practice.  
Mike Brown on Kobe Bryant's status for tonight's game against the "Out" Bryant continues to progress, but won't play tonight. 
The take on Bakersfield in the 2nd round of the playoffs starting Thursday. Keep it up guys!  
It's a 7:30pm PT tip for tonight's Lakers vs. matchup at STAPLES Center. TV: Prime Ticket in LA, TNT nationally. Radio: 
yup, this is Bynum's second POW of the year and third time him in his career he's received the honor. 
Andrew Bynum has been named Western Conference Player of the Week. Bynum averaged 21.8pts,16.8rebs & 1.5blks as the Lakers went 4-0. 
The team ended the team photo like they do every practice, with "1-2-3-RING"  
Your 2011-12 Los Angeles Lakers:  
It's team photo day for the Lakers.  
Big Men Celebrate  
STATS: Bynum 23pts 16rebs. 20pts 10rebs 5asts. Sessions 22pts. 18pts 6rebs 4asts. 11pts 11rebs. 
FINAL: Lakers 112, Mavs 108. Lakers win seesaw battle to improve to 4-1 w/o Kobe in the lineup. LA sweeps season series from Dallas 4-0. 
Lakers get the stop on Terry and the Mavs are forced to foul Barnes. Lakers ball up 110-108 with 3.8 left. 
Remember last time the Lakers played the Mavs got so 3-happy that we made this graphic for him:  
Gasol steps to the same spot in the left corner to nail his second straight 3-pointer!! Lakers up 106-104. 2:53 left. 
Lakers send out Sessions, Barnes, World Peace, Gasol and Bynum to start the overtime. 
Nowitzki's heave won't go. Overtime at STAPLES. 
Shot clocked turned off, Lakers ball tied up at 98. 
Sessions beats the buzzer with a 26ft three-pointer to push the Lakers back into the lead, 95-93. 20pts & 5asts for Ramon on the day. 
HUGE putback from Andrew Bynum on the missed 3 by MWP cuts the Mavs lead to one at 89-88. 5:25 left at STAPLES. 
we do too! 
Lakers trail 54-48 at the half. Ramon Sessions leads with 10pts. LA allows Dallas to shoot 55% from the field. 
Slow start for the Lakers, falling behind 27-22 after the 1st quarter while shooting just 33%. Bynum plays the entire 1st q & grabs 5rebs. 
first of many hopefully! Glad to have you with us. 
Barnes & Blake have been sparking the bench so Brown wants to keep them there for their energy. Ebanks fills in for Kobe. 
you're ready to go! 
Kobe's out today unfortunately. 
appreciate the long distance support! What time is it over there? 
hopefully he got high fives from the whole roster! 
negative 
STARTERS: Sessions, Ebanks, World Peace, Gasol & Bynum. TV: ABC // Radio:  
Beautiful day in LA RT Rollin up on the vs Mavs game! 🏀💜💛🏀❕#lakeshow  
MWP STAPLES Center  
Head coach Mike Brown confirms that Kobe Bryant will not play today against the Mavs. 
Lakers ride a three game winning streak into this afternoon's matchup with Action starts at 12:30pm PT on ABC & 
Lakers ride a three game winning streak into this afternoon's matchup with Action starts at 12:30pm PT on ABC & 
Lakers ride a three game winning streak into this afternoon's matchup with Action starts at 12:30pm PT on ABC & 
Lakers ride a three game winning streak into this afternoon's matchup with Action starts at 12:30pm PT on ABC & 
Lakers ride a three game winning streak into this afternoon's matchup with Action starts at 12:30pm PT on ABC & 
Lakers ride a three game winning streak into this afternoon's matchup with Action starts at 12:30pm PT on ABC & 
Lakers ride a three game winning streak into this afternoon's matchup with Action starts at 12:30pm PT on ABC & 
Lakers ride a three game winning streak into this afternoon's matchup with Action starts at 12:30pm PT on ABC & 
Lakers ride a three game winning streak into this afternoon's matchup with Action starts at 12:30pm PT on ABC & 
Lakers ride a three game winning streak into this afternoon's matchup with Action starts at 12:30pm PT on ABC & 
Lakers ride a three game winning streak into this afternoon's matchup with Action starts at 12:30pm PT on ABC & 
Lakers ride a three game winning streak into this afternoon's matchup with Action starts at 12:30pm PT on ABC & 
Lakers ride a three game winning streak into this afternoon's matchup with Action starts at 12:30pm PT on ABC & 
Lakers ride a three game winning streak into this afternoon's matchup with Action starts at 12:30pm PT on ABC & 
